











Advanced Accelerator Applications Announces Positive CHMP Opinion Recommending Approval of Lutetium 177Lu Oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) for Gastroenteropancreatic Neuroendocrine (GEP-NET) Tumors - NASDAQ.com








































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search















































See headlines for AAAP


View Print Version
                        
More from GlobeNewswire



Advanced Accelerator Applications Announces Positive CHMP Opinion Recommending Approval of Lutetium 177Lu Oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) for Gastroenteropancreatic Neuroendocrine (GEP-NET) Tumors
Advanced Accelerator Applications Reports 21% Sales Growth for First Quarter 2017
Advanced Accelerator Applications and Blue Earth Diagnostics Announce European Manufacturing and Distribution Agreements for Axumin™ (Fluciclovine (18F)) for PET Imaging of Recurrent Prostate Cancer



Referenced Stocks


AAAP
0%
Rate It





Advanced Accelerator Applications Announces Positive CHMP Opinion Recommending Approval of Lutetium 177Lu Oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) for Gastroenteropancreatic Neuroendocrine (GEP-NET) Tumors


By GlobeNewswire,  July 21, 2017, 08:30:00 AM EDT








Vote up







A
A
A









SAINT-GENIS-POUILLY, France, July  21, 2017  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A.(NASDAQ:AAAP) (AAA or the Company), an international specialist in Molecular Nuclear Medicine (MNM), today announced that the Committee for Medicinal Products for Human Use (CHMP) of the European Medicines Agency (EMA) has issued a positive opinion recommending the marketing authorization of lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide* (Lutathera®) for the treatment of unresectable or metastatic, progressive, well differentiated (G1 and G2), somatostatin receptor positive gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs) in adults. The European Commission (EC), which has the authority to approve medicines for the European Union, Iceland, Norway and Liechtenstein will review the CHMP recommendation.
Gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors, also known as GEP-NETs, are a group of tumors originating in the neuroendocrine cells of numerous organs. According to the European Society for Medical Oncology (ESMO), the crude incidence of GEP-NETs is estimated to be 5.25/100,000 per year.1 Lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) has received orphan drug designation from the EMA.
Stefano Buono, Chief Executive Officer of AAA, commented, "We are proud to achieve this important milestone. Peptide Receptor Radionuclide Therapy (PRRT) has been included in both the ESMO and European Neuroendocrine Tumor Society (ENETS) guidelines as a treatment option for certain NET indications since 2012, and now lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) is the very first PRRT to have achieved a positive CHMP opinion. We look forward to collaborating with the European health authorities to make lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) widely available as soon as possible. To date, more than 1,700 NET patients across 10 European countries have already received the treatment under compassionate use and named patient programs." 
The CHMP adopted its opinion based on results of a randomized pivotal Phase 3 study, NETTER-1 that compared treatment using lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide with a double dose of Octreotide LAR in 229 patients with inoperable midgut NETs progressive under standard Octreotide LAR treatment and overexpressing somatostatin receptors, as well as efficacy and safety data from the Erasmus Phase 1/2 trial conducted in more than 1,200 patients with a wide range of  NET indications including bronchial, pancreatic, foregut (excluding bronchial and pancreatic), midgut and hindgut.
The NETTER-1 study met its primary endpoint by demonstrating that treatment with lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide was associated with a statistically significant and clinically meaningful risk reduction of 79% in disease progression or death versus a treatment with a double dose of Octreotide LAR (hazard ratio 0.21, 95% CI: 0.13-0.33; p<0.001).2 Lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide, when administered concomitantly with a renal-protective agent, had low rates of grade three or four hematological toxicity, and no evidence of nephrotoxicity observed over the study time-frame (median follow-up time 14 months).2
* USAN: lutetium Lu 177 dotatate/INN: lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide

1 Öberg K, Knigge U, Kwekkeboom D, Perren A. Neuroendocrine gastro-entero-pancreatic tumors: ESMO Clinical Practice Guidelines for diagnosis, treatment and follow-up. Annals of Oncology. 2012;23 (Supplement 7):vii124-vii130.2 Strosberg J, El-Haddad G, Wolin E, Hendifar A, Yao J, Chasen B, Mittra E, Kunz PL, Kulke MH, Jacene H, et al. Phase 3 Trial of 177Lu-Dotatate for Midgut Neuroendocrine Tumors. N Engl J Med 2017;376:125-35. DOI: 10.1056/NEJMoa1607427.
About USAN: lutetium Lu 177 dotatate/INN: lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide (Lutathera®)
USAN: lutetium Lu 177 dotatate/INN: lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) is an investigational 177Lu-labeled somatostatin analog peptide. USAN: lutetium Lu 177 dotatate/INN: lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide, (Lutathera®) belongs to an emerging form of treatments called Peptide Receptor Radionuclide Therapy (PRRT), which involves targeting tumors with radiolabeled molecules that bind to specific receptors expressed by the tumor. This novel compound has received orphan drug designation from the European Medicines Agency (EMA) and the US Food and Drug Administration (FDA). Currently, USAN: lutetium Lu 177 dotatate/INN: lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) is administered on a compassionate use and named patient basis for the treatment of NETs and other tumors over-expressing somatostatin receptors in ten European countries and in the US under an Expanded Access Program (EAP). A New Drug Application submission to the FDA is currently under review.
About Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A.
Advanced Accelerator Applications is an innovative radiopharmaceutical company that develops, produces and commercializes Molecular Nuclear Medicine products. AAA's lead investigational therapeutic candidate, USAN: lutetium Lu 177 dotatate/INN: lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide (Lutathera®), is a novel MNM compound in development for the treatment of neuroendocrine tumors, a significant unmet medical need. Founded in 2002, AAA has its headquarters in Saint-Genis-Pouilly, France. AAA currently has 21 production and R&D facilities able to manufacture both diagnostics and therapeutic MNM products, and more than 500 employees in 13 countries (France, Italy, the UK, Germany, Switzerland, Spain, Poland, Portugal, The Netherlands, Belgium, Israel, the US and Canada). AAA reported sales of €109.3 million in 2016 (+23% vs. 2015). AAA is listed on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the ticker "AAAP". For more information, please visit: www.adacap.com.
About Molecular Nuclear Medicine ("MNM")
Molecular Nuclear Medicine is a medical specialty using trace amounts of active substances, called radiopharmaceuticals, to create images of organs and lesions, and to treat various diseases, like cancer. The technique works by injecting targeted radiopharmaceuticals into the patient's body that accumulate in the organs or lesions and reveal specific biochemical processes. MNM can be divided in two branches: Molecular Nuclear Diagnostics and Molecular Nuclear Therapy. Molecular nuclear diagnostics employs a variety of imaging devices and radiopharmaceuticals. PET (Positron Emission Tomography) and SPECT (Single Photon Emission Computed Tomography) are highly sensitive imaging technologies that enable physicians to diagnose different types of cancer, cardiovascular diseases, neurological disorders and other diseases in their early stages. Molecular nuclear therapy uses radioactive sources (radionuclides) to treat a range of tumor types. Using short-range particles, this therapy can target tumors with little effect on normal tissues.
Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Statements 
This press release contains forward-looking statements. All statements, other than statements of historical facts, contained in this press release, including statements regarding the Company's strategy, future operations, future financial position, future revenues, projected costs, prospects, plans and objectives of management, are forward-looking statements. The words "anticipate," "believe," "estimate," "expect," "intend," "may," "plan," "predict," "project," "target," "potential," "will," "would," "could," "should," "continue," and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements, although not all forward-looking statements contain these identifying words. Forward-looking statements that appear in a number of places in this press release include the Company's current expectation regarding future events and various matters, including expected timing of filings with the FDA and EMA, and approval dates. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results, events or developments to be materially different from any future results, events or developments expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. Such factors include, but are not limited to, changing market conditions, the successful and timely completion of clinical studies, the timing of our submission of applications for regulatory approvals, EMA, FDA and other regulatory approvals for our product candidates, the occurrence of side effects or serious adverse events caused by or associated with our products and product candidates; our ability to procure adequate quantities of necessary supplies and raw materials for USAN: lutetium Lu 177 dotatate/INN: lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) and other chemical compounds acceptable for use in our manufacturing processes from our suppliers; our ability to organize timely and safe delivery of our products or product candidates by third parties; any problems with the manufacture, quality or performance of our products or product candidates; the rate and degree of market acceptance and the clinical utility of USAN: lutetium Lu 177 dotatate/INN: lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) and our other products or product candidates; our estimates regarding the market opportunity for USAN: lutetium Lu 177 dotatate/INN: lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide (Lutathera®), our other product candidates and our existing products; our anticipation that we will generate higher sales as we diversify our products; our ability to implement our growth strategy including expansion in the US; our ability to sustain and create additional sales, marketing and distribution capabilities; our intellectual property and licensing position; legislation or regulation in countries where we sell our products that affect product pricing, taxation, reimbursement, access or distribution channels; regulatory actions or litigation; and general economic, political, demographic and business conditions in Europe, the US and elsewhere. Except as required by applicable securities laws, we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Contacts:

AAA Corporate CommunicationsRachel Levine
Director of Communications
rachel.levine@adacap.com
Tel: + 1-212-235-2395

AAA Investor Relations
Jordan Silverstein
Director of Investor Relations
jordan.silverstein@adacap.com
Tel: + 1-212-235-2394

Media inquiries:

Makovsky & CompanyLee Daviesldavies@makovsky.com
Tel: +212-508-9651







Source: Advanced Accelerator Applications





                
  		            This article appears in: 
                    
                            News Headlines




                
                    Referenced Stocks: 
                    
                            AAAP




Latest News Video

Jordan releases security footage of... Douglas County deputies look for dr... La Plata County officials, Dylan's ... Woman Brutally Beaten with Brass Kn... 








Login




Please enable JavaScript to view the Comments powered by RealTidbits







Related stocks Articles




Subscribe







Applied Materials Is Grabbing a New CFO From NXP Semiconductors. That's Great News for...Qualcomm?


						7/25/2017 07:47 PM
					



Why Foot Locker, Inc. Stock Has Lost 35% This Year


						7/25/2017 07:45 PM
					



Better Buy: Raytheon Company vs. Northrop Grumman


						7/25/2017 07:41 PM
					












CLOSEX


Sign-in



















                        Existing NASDAQ.com member? Log in here.  
                    


                By signing into to the site using any of the third-party services above, you agree to NASDAQ.com's Terms of Use.
                


                Welcome back: 

                Log in using your: 
                
                 Account
                
Switch Accounts


















Highest Rated Articles of Last Week



Yatra Attains Leadership Position in Corporate Travel With the...
Merck and Pfizer Collaborate with Corning to Modernize ...
PetIQ, Inc. (Nasdaq: PETQ) to Ring The Nasdaq Stock Market Opening...
South Alabama Property Receives CSX Select Site Designation
GameStop and ThinkGeek Bring Comic-Con to You





View All Highest Rated




















Today's Market Activity





NASDAQ

6412.17


1.36
 ▲ 
0.02%





DJIA

21613.43


100.26
 ▲ 
0.47%





S&P 500

2477.13


7.22
 ▲ 
0.29%










Data as of Jul 25, 2017


Try for Free: NASDAQ LiveQuotes Platform



View All
















Upcoming Earnings



Company
Expected Report Date




AAPL
Jul 25, 2017


ODFL
Jul 27, 2017


FB
Jul 26, 2017


TSLA
Aug 2, 2017


T
Jul 20, 2017


AMZN
Jul 27, 2017


VZ
Jul 27, 2017


GE
Jul 21, 2017





Earnings Calendar





























CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX








































Advanced Accelerator Applicatio (NASDAQ:AAAP) Trading Volume Significantly Higher - Highlight Press

























































Highlight PressBreaking Tech News, Entertainment, Mortgages and More
Advanced Accelerator Applicatio (NASDAQ:AAAP) Trading Volume Significantly Higher
July 17, 2017 By Clarence Martin Tweet        Advertisement





103K shares changed hands in the last trading session.  Trading volume was up 42.26% over the stocks average daily volume.  Traders are more bullish lately as indicated by the change in short interest.  The stock realized a fall in short interest between June 15, 2017 and May 31, 2017 of -45.00%.  Short shares decreased from 280,851 to 154,478 over that period. 
 Here are some other firms who have updated their holdings.   As of quarter end Morgan Stanley had bought 1,778 shares growing its stake by 56.7%. The value in dollars increased from $84,000 to $196,000 a change of 133.3% since the last quarter. As of the end of the quarter Price T Rowe Associates Inc /md/ had disposed of  a total of 86,994 shares trimming its position 3.6%. The value of the investment in (AAAP) went from $64,742,000 to $92,967,000 increasing 43.6% quarter over quarter.
 As of quarter end Baker Bros. Advisors Lp had bought  a total of 54,569 shares growing its holdings by 2.5%. The value of the investment in Advanced Accelerator Applicatio went from $57,993,000 to $88,557,000 a change of $30,564,000 for the reporting period. Scopia Capital Management Lp cut its holdings by selling 551,340 shares a decrease of 30.9% in the quarter. Scopia Capital Management Lp now controls 1,231,442 shares with a value of $49,085,000. The value of the position overall is up by 2.9%.
  On June 15 analysts at JP Morgan initiated coverage on the stock setting a rating of “Overweight”. On November 29, 2016 the stock rating was changed to a “Market Perform” in a report from Wells Fargo which is down from the previous “Outperform” rating.





 Equity analyst Wells Fargo added AAAP to its research portfolio with a rating of “Outperform”. March 16 investment analysts at Citigroup left the company rating at “Neutral” and raised the price expectation from $32.00 to $36.00.
 On March 9 JMP Securities held the stock rating at “Market Outperform” but lowered the price target  to $36.00 from $44.00. On December 7, 2015 Canaccord Genuity began coverage of the stock giving it an initial rating of “Buy”.
 The company is so far trading down by -0.60% since yesterday’s close of $40.12. 
 Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A., launched on March 1, 2002, is a radiopharmaceutical company. The Company develops, produces and commercializes molecular nuclear medicine (MNM), diagnostic and therapeutic products. MNM uses trace amounts of radioactive compounds to create functional images of organs and lesions and to treat diseases, such as cancer. The Company has a portfolio of nine diagnostic positron emission tomography (PET) and single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) products. PET and SPECT are imaging techniques in molecular nuclear diagnostics (MND) with applications in clinical oncology, cardiology, neurology and inflammatory/infectious diseases. AAA’s diagnostic product is Gluscan, its branded 18-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET imaging agent. Gluscan assists in the diagnosis of serious medical conditions, primarily in oncology, by assessing glucose metabolism. Additional MND product candidates include Annexin V-128, a SPECT product candidate for the imaging of apoptotic and necrotic lesions with potential applications in a range of indications..






         Advertisement






         Advertisement






 

Mortgage Rate Updates
Interest Rates for Home Mortgages at HSBC, BMO Harris Jul 25, 2017BMO Harris BankThe best 30 year loan interest rates at BMO Harris Bank are coming out at … [Read More...]Mortgage Rates Looking Worse Today at Wells, TD Bank Tuesday Jul 25, 2017Wells FargoThe best 30 year loan interest rates are being quoted at 4.000% at Wells Fargo … [Read More...]Today’s  Interest Rates for Home Mortgages at Commerce Bank, Citizens Jul 25, 2017Commerce BankThe benchmark 30 year loan interest rates at Commerce Bank have been listed at … [Read More...]Tuesday’s  Mortgage Interest Rates at PNC Bank, Chase Jul 25, 2017Chase BankThe best 30 year fixed rate loan interest rates at Chase Bank (NYSE:JPM) are … [Read More...]
Sports
Lonzo Ball’s Latest Footwear Has Well and Truly FloppedHere’s a question – would all the social media hype and celebrity endorsements in the world encourage you to spend $500 on a pair of basketball … [Read More...]Super Bowl Winners to Pocket $107,000 Per Player – Tax-Free!It’s long been known that the tax returns of professional athletes are just about as complex as it gets. This is because not only do they have to pay … [Read More...]
Top News
Business
Technology
Sports
Entertainment
Life
Mortgages
Also In the News…

About Us
Writers
Advertise With Us
Contact Us

 Reuters: Technology News
Wall Street regulator says digital coin offerings may require oversightTesla Model S regains top rating after software update: Consumer ReportsTexas Instruments' profit beats on automotive, industrial demand

 Highlight Press is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC Associates Program, an affiliate advertising program designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com.










Advanced Accelerator Applications – AAA | Bridging science with life


































































Advanced Accelerator Applications 
Bridging science with life










 




			            Our ambition at Advanced Accelerator Applications is to turn scientific findings into life enhancing applications.			            










 




Advanced Accelerator Applications Announces Positive CHMP Opinion Recommending Approval of Lutetium 177Lu Oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) for Gastroenteropancreatic Neuroendocrine (GEP-NET) Tumors - July 2017

AAA today announced that the Committee for Medicinal Products for Human Use (CHMP) of the European Medicines Agency (EMA) has issued a positive opinion recommending the marketing authorization of lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide* (Lutathera®) for the treatment of unresectable or metastatic, progressive, well differentiated (G1 and G2), somatostatin receptor positive gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs) in adults. The European Commission (EC), which has the authority to approve medicines for the European Union, Iceland, Norway and Liechtenstein will review the CHMP recommendation.

Read More
















		                    	A worldwide presence		                    
AAA operates in Belgium, Canada, France, Germany, Israel, Italy, the Netherlands, Poland, Portugal, Spain, Switzerland, UK and USA while its distribution network covers more than 30 countries. Please point to any of the locations to pull up specific details about each facility.

 
Read More










		                    	Products		                    
Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) develops, produces and commercializes molecular nuclear medicine, diagnostic and therapeutic products in the fields of oncology (cancer), neurology, cardiology and infectious & inflammatory diseases.
Read More










		                    	Pipeline		                    
Our most advanced investigational product candidates in development are Lutetium Lu 177 dotatate, and Annexin V-128. Lutetium Lu 177 dotatate is an investigational Molecular Nuclear Therapy candidate.
Read More








Molecular Nuclear Medicine
Making personalised treatment a reality.
AAA is a European leader in the production and commercialization of PET (Positron Emission Tomography) and SPECT (Single Photon Emission Tomography) radiopharmaceuticals and is able to produce and deliver both commercial drugs and research products.


Discover
Our documentary about Molecular Nuclear Medicine and cancer.
Molecular Nuclear Medicine with a 22’ documentary from the history of radioactivity and cancer to the most modern Theragnostic techniques. You will understand how SPECT and PET work, and how Radio Metabolic Therapy can treat cancer.























About Us | Advanced Accelerator Applications – AAA


































































Advanced Accelerator Applications 
Bridging science with life










 




Home > Company > About Us 




 


About Us 

Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an innovative radiopharmaceutical company that develops, produces and commercializes molecular nuclear medicine, or MNM, products.
AAA is a European leader in the production and commercialization of molecular nuclear diagnostic radiopharmaceuticals for PET and SPECT. These radiopharmaceuticals are mainly used for diagnosis in clinical oncology, cardiology and neurology.
AAA’s lead investigational therapeutic candidate, lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera®) is a Lutetium-177, or Lu-177, labeled somatostatin analogue peptide in development for the treatment of neuroendocrine tumors, or NETs, a significant unmet medical need. A New Drug Application and Marketing Authorization Application for lutetium Lu 177 dotatate are currently under review with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) and the European Medicines Agency (EMA). Lutetium Lu 177 dotatate has received orphan drug designation from both the FDA and EMA. 
AAA currently has 21 production and research & development facilities that manufacture both diagnostic and therapeutic Molecular Nuclear Medicine products, and over 530 employees in 13 countries (Belgium, Canada, France, Germany, Israel, Italy, the Netherlands, Poland, Portugal, Spain, Switzerland, UK and US).




AAA Companies 
Barnatron
Ephoran
Gipharma
IDB Group
Imaging Equipment
Marshall Isotopes























Products | Advanced Accelerator Applications – AAA


































































Advanced Accelerator Applications 
Bridging science with life










 




Home > Products 




 


Products 

Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) develops, produces and commercializes diagnostic and therapeutic Molecular Nuclear Medicine products in the fields of oncology, neurology, cardiology and infectious & inflammatory diseases.
AAA produces and delivers both commercial drugs and research products for clinical or pre-clinical studies. AAA laboratories are GMP certified for the manufacturing of Investigational Medical Products (IMP).
AAA has one of the broadest PET portfolios in Europe (GLUSCAN®, FLUOROCHOL, DOPAVIEW®, CARDIOGEN-82®) and has a growing presence in SPECT, with its own products (MIBITEC and LEUKOKIT®) as well as third-party manufacturer and distributor agreements (NEUROLITE®). AAA also has an important portfolio of PET, SPECT and therapy products in development. SOMAKIT, a PET product, recently received a positive opinion on its Marketing Authorization Application from the European Medicines Agency.
Commercial products
AAA has built a leadership position in Molecular Nuclear Medicine in Europe by manufacturing and commercializing a portfolio of seven diagnostic PET and SPECT products for a number of indications in clinical oncology, cardiology, neurology and inflammatory/infectious diseases. Our main European products are GLUSCAN®, FLUOROCHOL, DOPAVIEW®, CARDIOGEN-82®, MIBITEC, NEUROLITE®, and LEUKOKIT®. In addition, we have a PET product approved in the United States (NETSPOT®).




Product
Description
Indications
Marketing Authorization




NETSPOT® 

Kit for the preparation of gallium Ga 68 dotatate injection, for PET imaging

PET imaging for localization of somatostatin receptor positive neuroendocrine tumors (NETs) in adult and pediatric patients

United States






NETSPOT® (formerly known as Somakit-TATE) is a novel patented drug kit developed by AAA for the preparation of gallium Ga 68 dotatate for injection, for localization of somatostatin receptor positive neuroendocrine tumors (NETs) in adult and pediatric patients using positron emission tomography (PET). The kit has been designated as an orphan drug by the EMA and the FDA. NETSPOT® is the first FDA approved drug using Ga 68 as a positron emitter.


Kit for the preparation of gallium Ga 68 dotatate injection, for PET imaging



PET imaging for localization of somatostatin receptor positive neuroendocrine tumors (NETs) in adult and pediatric patients



United States






SOMAKIT TOC™ 

Kit for the preparation of gallium (Ga 68) edotreotide solution for PET imaging

PET imaging for localization of primary tumors and metastases in patients with confirmed or suspected well-differentiated gastro-enteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NET)

European Union






SomaKit TOC™ is a novel kit developed by AAA for the preparation of gallium Ga 68 edotreotide solution for injection used for localization of primary tumors and metastases in patients with confirmed or suspected well-differentiated gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NET) in adults. The kit has been designated as an orphan drug by the EMA and the FDA. SomaKit TOC™ is the first ready-to-use EMA approved kit for radiopharmaceutical preparation using Ga 68 as a positron emitter.


Kit for the preparation of gallium (Ga 68) edotreotide solution for PET imaging



PET imaging for localization of primary tumors and metastases in patients with confirmed or suspected well-differentiated gastro-enteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NET)



European Union






Gluscan® /  Gluscan 500 /  Barnascan 

Our brand names for FDG  (concentration = 600MBq*/ml and 500MBq*/ml at calibration time for Gluscan® and Gluscan® 500, respectively; 3,000MBq*/ml for Barnascan at calibration time)

PET tracer for oncology, cardiology, neurology and infectious/inflammatory diseases

Gluscan®: Belgium, France, Italy, Luxembourg, Switzerland
Gluscan® 500: France, Germany, Poland,Portugal, Spain
Barnascan: Spain






GLUSCAN®, which includes GLUSCAN® 500 and Barnascan, is our leading PET product. Its active ingredient is FDG-18, or FDG, the most widely used PET tracer. GLUSCAN® contains a radioactive marker that enables the detection of a number of conditions in oncology, neurology, cardiology and inflammatory and infectious disease.
We manufacture and organize distribution for GLUSCAN® from our production sites in France, Italy, Portugal, Spain, Germany and Poland.
We are a leading supplier of FDG in Europe, and develop, manufacture and distribute our FDG products in an integrated fashion through our operating facilities, enabling reliable production, service and delivery to nuclear medicine end-users.


Our brand names for FDG  (concentration = 600MBq*/ml and 500MBq*/ml at calibration time for Gluscan® and Gluscan® 500, respectively; 3,000MBq*/ml for Barnascan at calibration time)



PET tracer for oncology, cardiology, neurology and infectious/inflammatory diseases



Gluscan®: Belgium, France, Italy, Luxembourg, Switzerland
Gluscan® 500: France, Germany, Poland,Portugal, Spain
Barnascan: Spain






FLUOROCHOL / AAACHOLINE 

Our brand names for 18F-choline (FCH)

PET tracer for detecting metastasis of prostate cancer

Fluorochol: France
AAACholine: Switzerland






This drug is purely for diagnostic use. 18F-choline (FCH) is intended for Positron Emission Tomography (PET). Both FLUOROCHOL and AAACHOLINE are indicated for imaging in patients undergoing oncologic diagnostic procedures describing function or diseases where enhanced choline influx of specific organs or tissues is the diagnostic target. The main indication is the initial staging and restaging of prostate cancer in case of biochemical recurrence. In addition, FLUOROCHOL is indicated for the localization of lesions of proven and well-differentiated hepatocellular carcinoma, and the characterization and/or staging of hepatocellular carcinoma, when FDG PET is non-conclusive and/or when surgery is scheduled.


Our brand names for 18F-choline (FCH)



PET tracer for detecting metastasis of prostate cancer



Fluorochol: France
AAACholine: Switzerland






DOPAVIEW® 

Our brand name for 6-fluoro-(18F)-L-DOPA, a DOPA analogue

PET tracer for diagnostic use, with key applications in neurology and oncology

France, Switzerland






6-fluoro-(18F)-L-DOPA, is an analogue of DOPA, an aromatic amino acid that accumulates rapidly in target tissues particularly the striatum of human brain and is transformed into dopamine, a neurotransmitter from the catecholamine group.

 

This drug is purely for diagnostic use. In neurology, PET with DOPAVIEW® is indicated for detection of a functional loss of dopaminergic nerve endings in the striatum. It can be used for diagnosing Parkinson's disease and for the differentiation between essential tremor and parkinsonian syndromes. In oncology, among the various imaging studies, PET with DOPAVIEW® enables a functional approach to pathologies, organs or tissues in which increased intracellular transport and decarboxylation of the amino acid dihydroxyphenylalanine (DOPA) is being investigated.

 

The following indications have been documented in the greatest detail:

Diagnosis, localization, staging and detection of recurrences or residual disease of pheochromocytomas and paragangliomas,
Diagnosis and localization of beta-cell hyperplasia in cases of hyperinsulinism in infants and children,
Staging and detection of recurrences or residual disease of well-differentiated midgut neuroendocrine tumors,
Detection of recurrences or residual disease of cerebral gliomas, medullary thyroid cancer and other digestive neuroendocrine tumors when the imaging of somatostatin receptors is negative.



Our brand name for 6-fluoro-(18F)-L-DOPA, a DOPA analogue



PET tracer for diagnostic use, with key applications in neurology and oncology



France, Switzerland






CARDIOGEN-82® 

A closed system used to produce rubidium Rb 82 chloride injection for intravenous use.

PET imaging of the myocardium under rest or pharmacologic stress conditions to evaluate regional myocardial perfusion in adult patients with suspected or existing coronary artery disease.

Switzerland






CARDIOGEN-82® (rubidium Rb-82) is a myocardial perfusion PET imaging agent for the detection and evaluation of coronary artery disease with Myocardial Perfusion Imaging. It offers a safe, non-invasive alternative to angiography and provides excellent detection of the disease, improved efficiency, lower radiation exposure, fewer attenuation artefacts and improved resolution.

AAA has the exclusive distribution license for CARDIOGEN-82® in Europe. CARDIOGEN-82® is approved for use in the U.S. where it is manufactured by Bracco Diagnostics Inc.



A closed system used to produce rubidium Rb 82 chloride injection for intravenous use.



PET imaging of the myocardium under rest or pharmacologic stress conditions to evaluate regional myocardial perfusion in adult patients with suspected or existing coronary artery disease.



Switzerland






MIBITEC and Adamibi 

Our brand names for a generic version of a widely used SPECT cardiac imaging agent

SPECT tracer for myocardial exploration, localization of parathyroid tissue and breast cancer diagnosis

MIBITEC: Austria, France, Germany, Luxembourg, Poland, Slovenia
Adamibi: Greece, Italy






MIBITEC and Adamibi are our brand names for a generic version of the most widely used SPECT cardiac imaging agent, Tetrakis (2-methoxyisobutyl isonitrile) copper (I) tetrafluoroborate. They are approved for myocardial exploration, localization of parathyroid tissue and breast cancer diagnosis. MIBITEC was first launched in France in late 2010 and its marketing authorization has been extended to Austria, Germany, Poland, Luxembourg and Slovenia. We also market it in Greece and Italy under the name Adamibi. We intend to expand our sales of MIBITEC and Adamibi by selling them in new markets and are currently seeking marketing authorizations for MIBITEC and Adamibi in other European countries.


Our brand names for a generic version of a widely used SPECT cardiac imaging agent



SPECT tracer for myocardial exploration, localization of parathyroid tissue and breast cancer diagnosis



MIBITEC: Austria, France, Germany, Luxembourg, Poland, Slovenia
Adamibi: Greece, Italy






Leukokit® 

Medical device for the separation and labeling of autologous leukocytes

Identifies sites of infection or inflammation in the body

CE mark: can be commercialized throughout Europe






LEUKOKIT® is a registered single-use medical device that contains all the necessary materials (with the exception of the radiopharmaceutical agent) to carry out separation and labeling of autologous leukocytes. The resulting labelled leukocytes are administered to patients to identify sites of infection or inflammation in the body. The use of LEUKOKIT® simplifies the procedure for identifying such sites and improves the operator’s safety and the microbiological quality of the labeled cell preparation. Its use only requires a bench centrifuge, basic equipment often present in laboratories, enabling radiolabeling without expensive equipment. LEUKOKIT® meets the essential requirements of all relevant European Medical Device Directives and carries the CE-mark, a legal requirement permitting the marketing of a medical device throughout the European Union.


Medical device for the separation and labeling of autologous leukocytes



Identifies sites of infection or inflammation in the body



CE mark: can be commercialized throughout Europe






NEUROLITE® 

A kit for radiopharmaceutical preparation of Technetium (99mTc) Bicisate Injection.

Tc-99m Bicisate scintigraphy is indicated in the evaluation of regional cerebral perfusion abnormalities in adult patients with central nervous system disorders.

Held by Lantheus MI UK, Ltd.; AAA distribution in France, Spain






AAA has an exclusive distribution license for NEUROLITE® in France and Spain.


A kit for radiopharmaceutical preparation of Technetium (99mTc) Bicisate Injection.



Tc-99m Bicisate scintigraphy is indicated in the evaluation of regional cerebral perfusion abnormalities in adult patients with central nervous system disorders.



Held by Lantheus MI UK, Ltd.; AAA distribution in France, Spain






LuMark® 

Our licensed brand name for cGMP produced Lutetium-177, a radiopharmaceutical precursor

NA

All EU countries, Norway, Iceland, Liechtenstein






IDB Holland bv (a AAA company) produces, markets and sells LuMark® Lu-177 chloride, 80 GBq/mL. Our Lu-177 has received European Marketing Authorization as a radiopharmaceutical precursor. Lutetium-177 is an emitter of high-energy beta particles (used for many years in radiation oncology to treat solid cancers) that can be effectively used to deliver toxic effects to metastatic cancers. Currently IDB is distributing Lu-177 chloride worldwide.


Our licensed brand name for cGMP produced Lutetium-177, a radiopharmaceutical precursor



NA



All EU countries, Norway, Iceland, Liechtenstein







* MBq refers to a megabecquerel, a unit of radiation measurement.























Pipeline | Advanced Accelerator Applications – AAA


































































Advanced Accelerator Applications 
Bridging science with life










 




Home > Research & Development > Pipeline 




 


Pipeline 

Our pipeline of investigational Molecular Nuclear Medicine product candidates addresses a number of significant unmet diagnostic and medical needs.
Investigational Candidates in Clinical Development:



Indication


Discovery


Preclinical


Phase I


Phase II


Phase III


Filing


Marketed




Neuroendocrine tumors

Filing

Lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera®)
Therapeutics




Neuroendocrine tumors

Marketed

NETSPOT® (SOMAKIT-TATE)
Diagnostics: PET




Neuroendocrine tumors

Marketed

SOMAKIT TOC™ 
Diagnostics: PET




Apoptosis and necrosis

Phase II

ANNEXIN V-128
Diagnostics: SPECT




Prostate cancer

Preclinical

177Lu PSMA-R2
Therapeutics




Prostate cancer

Preclinical

68Ga PSMA-R2
Diagnostics: PET




Gastrointestinal stromal tumors, Prostate cancer, Breast cancer

Preclinical

177Lu-NeoBOMB1
Therapeutics




Gastrointestinal stromal tumors, Prostate cancer, Breast cancer

Phase I

68Ga-NeoBOMB1
Diagnostics: PET



Lutetium Lu 177 dotatate. Lutetium Lu 177 dotatate is a Lu-177-labeled somatostatin analogue peptide currently in development for the treatment of gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs), including foregut, midgut, and hindgut neuroendocrine tumors in adults. Lutetium Lu 177 dotatate belongs to an emerging form of treatments called Peptide Receptor Radionuclide Therapy (“PRRT“), which involves targeting carcinoid tumors with radiolabeled somatostatin analogue peptides. This novel compound has received orphan drug designation from the European Medicines Agency (EMA) and the US Food and Drug Administration (FDA). Lutetium Lu 177 dotatate is also currently administered on a compassionate use and named patient basis for the treatment of NETs and other tumors over-expressing somatostatin receptors in ten European countries and in the US under an Expanded Access Program (EAP) for midgut NETs. NDA and MAA submissions to the FDA and EMA are currently under review.
NETSPOT® (formerly known as Somakit-TATE) and SomaKit TOC™. Somakit-TATE and SomaKit TOC™, or our Somakit products, are novel drug kits for radiolabeling somatostatin analogue peptides to help diagnose somatostatin receptor positive NET lesions. These products have received orphan drug designation from the EMA and the FDA. In June 2016, AAA received the FDA approval for NETSPOT® and in December 2016, the European Commission approved SomaKit TOC™.
Annexin V-128 (99MTc-rhAnnexin V-128). Annexin V-128 is a SPECT diagnostic candidate for the assessment of apoptotic and necrotic processes, which are present in a number of pathological conditions in oncology and cardiovascular disease, as well as in autoimmune disorders. A Phase I trial of Annexin V-128 was conducted at the University of Ottawa Heart Institute in Canada in December 2014 to assess its safety, tolerability, biodistribution and dosimetry in Canada. Annexin V-128 is currently in a Phase I/II trial for the treatment of rheumatoid arthritis and ankylosing spondylitis and two Phase II studies in cardiovascular and cardio-oncology indications.
177Lu-PSMA-R2 and 68Ga-PSMA-R2. 177Lu-PSMA-R2 and 68Ga-PSMA-R2 are in development to treat, image, monitor and stage prostate cancer. 177Lu-PSMA-R2 will be aimed at treating and monitoring prostate cancer and 68Ga-PSMA-R2 should act as its companion diagnostic and help diagnose and stage the disease. AAA has signed an exclusive license agreement with Johns Hopkins University in Baltimore, Maryland to develop and market PSMA-R2, in prostate cancer.
177Lu-NEOBOMB1 and 68Ga-NEOBOM1. NeoBOMB1 is a unique new generation antagonist bombesin analogue targeting GRPR-expressing malignancies. Our plan is to radiolabel NeoBOMB1 to develop a theragnostic pair: 177Lu-NeoBOMB1 for treatment and a 68Ga-NeoBOMB1 for diagnosis. AAA has signed an exclusive license agreement with Erasmus University Medical Center (UMC) and Demokritos National Center for Scientific Research to develop NeoBOMB1. AAA is currently planning three clinical studies in different indications including gastrointestinal stromal tumors, prostate cancer and breast cancer.























Our Business | Advanced Accelerator Applications – AAA


































































Advanced Accelerator Applications 
Bridging science with life










 




Home > Company > Our Business 




Our Business 

AAA is the fastest-growing player in the European radiopharmaceutical PET market.
At AAA we have:

A unique industrial approach to PET production: largest EU presence of industrial proprietary laboratories.
A reliable pharmaceutical production in PET
A best-in-class technology and highest pharmaceutical standards
Production and R&D activities in tandem to drive innovation

A proven track record
The combination of our pan-European platform, our production infrastructure and our proven and reliable logistical capabilities has enabled us to secure significant customer loyalty and establish our position as a partner for global players, such as GE Healthcare and Eli Lilly, for the production of their molecular diagnostic products.

AAA has a proven track record in:

managing short product shelf lives (F-18 PET products have a 10 hour shelf life),
mastering complex logistics, and
reliability.




Our network has a longstanding track record of supplying high-quality products to our customers: we have successfully delivered, through third parties, over 1,079,400 doses (representing approximately 40,100 batches) of F-18 PET diagnostic products to over 250 hospitals in Europe.
Our SPECT know-how is founded on more than 2.2 million vials manufactured.
Our key therapy product candidate, lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera), has been administered to over 3,000 NET patients in various studies and has received approval for use on a compassionate use and named patient basis in ten countries in Europe for progressive midgut NETs and pNETs. We have delivered, through third parties over 4,600 doses of lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera) for these programs.

Our Strengths

A leadership position and vertical integration to produce differentiated MNM products
Lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera): a radiopharmaceutical late-stage therapeutic candidate targeting midgut NETs
A diversified, attractive product candidate development pipeline
An established MNM platform in a market characterized by significant barriers to entry
A highly qualified and experienced management team with a proven track-record of launching innovative products and successfully integrating acquired companies
























Special Programs | Advanced Accelerator Applications – AAA


































































Advanced Accelerator Applications 
Bridging science with life










 




Home > Products > Special Programs 




Special Programs 

Meeting the medical need for advanced NET therapies
NETs (NeuroEndocrine Tumors) are a heterogeneous group of tumors originating in the neuroendocrine cells of the body. The unmet medical need for an effective treatment of inoperable, advanced NETs is well known. More specifically, there is no therapeutic options for patients with NETs other than pancreatic (about 90% of NETs) who are progressive under somatostatin analogues.
In Molecular Nuclear Therapy, a radioisotope is attached to a “targeting molecule”. This molecule brings the radioisotope in the tumor cells where its energy will be released and destroy targeted tissues.
Our lead investigational candidate, 177Lutetium Dotatate, is a novel compound in development for the treatment of midgut neuroendocrine tumors. Lutathera is a somatostatin analogue peptide (the “targeting molecule”) which has been labeled with Lutetium-177 (the radioisotope). Upon injection, 177Lutetium Dotataterapidly binds to neuroendocrine tumors where it releases its energy in a targeted manner, it is then rapidly cleared from the body via urines.
Results of a pivotal Phase III trial of 177Lutetium Dotatate in patients with inoperable progressive midgut NETs were published in the New England Journal of Medicine and 177Lutetium Dotatate is currently made available through compassionate use/named patient basis programs in ten selected European countries (Austria, Denmark, Estonia, Finland, France, Greece, Portugal, Spain, Switzerland and UK) and the U.S.




















Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 25, 2017 8:41 PM ET
Biotechnology

Company Overview of Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A., a radiopharmaceutical company, develops, produces, and commercializes radiolabeled pharmaceuticals and diagnostic nuclear medicines in France and internationally. It provides positron emission tomography (PET) products, including Gluscan, a branded 18-fluorodeoxyglucose PET imaging agent that assists in the diagnosis of oncology through assessing glucose metabolism; DOPAVIEW, a PET tracer for diagnostic use with applications in neurology and oncology sectors; and FluoroChol, a PET tracer for detecting metastasis of prostate cancer and hepatocellular carcinoma. The company also offers single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) products comprisin...
Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A., a radiopharmaceutical company, develops, produces, and commercializes radiolabeled pharmaceuticals and diagnostic nuclear medicines in France and internationally. It provides positron emission tomography (PET) products, including Gluscan, a branded 18-fluorodeoxyglucose PET imaging agent that assists in the diagnosis of oncology through assessing glucose metabolism; DOPAVIEW, a PET tracer for diagnostic use with applications in neurology and oncology sectors; and FluoroChol, a PET tracer for detecting metastasis of prostate cancer and hepatocellular carcinoma. The company also offers single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) products comprising Tetrakis (2-methoxyisobutyl isonitrile) copper (I) tetrafluoroborate, a cardiac imaging agent for myocardial exploration, localization of parathyroid tissue, and breast cancer diagnosis; and Leukokit, a single-use medical device to carry out separation and labeling of autologous leukocytes. In addition, it offers NETSPOT, a kit for the preparation of gallium Ga 68 dotatate injection for the localization of somatostatin receptor positive neuroendocrine tumors in adult and pediatric patients using PET; SomaKit TOC, a kit for radiopharmaceutical preparation of gallium edotreotide solution; and Annexin V-128, a SPECT radiopharmaceutical product candidate for the imaging of apoptotic and necrotic lesions. Its products that are in clinical development comprise Lutathera, a Lu-177 labeled somatostatin analogue peptide that has been approved for the treatment of neuro endocrine tumors; PSMA-R2, a selective PSMA-targeted ligand for prostate cancer; and NeoBOMB1, an antagonist bombesin analogue targeting GRPR-expressing malignancies. The company serves public and private hospitals, universities, third-party research laboratories, clinical centers, and pharmaceutical companies. Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. was founded in 2002 and is headquartered in Saint Genis Pouilly, France.
Detailed Description


20 rue DieselSaint Genis Pouilly,  01630FranceFounded in 2002500 Employees



Phone: 33 4 50 99 30 70

Fax: 33 4 50 99 30 71

www.adacap.com







Key Executives for Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A.


Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. does not have any Key Executives recorded. 



Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Key Developments

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Announces Positive CHMP Opinion Recommending Approval of Lutetium 177Lu Oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) for Gastroenteropancreatic Neuroendocrine (GEP-NET) Tumors
Jul 21 17
Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. announced that the Committee for Medicinal Products for Human Use (CHMP) of the European Medicines Agency (EMA) has issued a positive opinion recommending the marketing authorization of lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) for the treatment of unresectable or metastatic, progressive, well differentiated (G1 and G2), somatostatin receptor positive gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs) in adults. The European Commission (EC), which has the authority to approve medicines for the European Union, Iceland, Norway and Liechtenstein will review the CHMP recommendation. Gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors, also known as GEP-NETs, are a group of tumors originating in the neuroendocrine cells of numerous organs. According to the European Society for Medical Oncology (ESMO), the crude incidence of GEP-NETs is estimated to be 5.25/100,000 per year. 1 Lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) has received orphan drug designation from the EMA. The CHMP adopted its opinion based on results of a randomized pivotal Phase 3 study, NETTER-1 that compared treatment using lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide with a double dose of Octreotide LAR in 229 patients with inoperable midgut NETs progressive under standard Octreotide LAR treatment and overexpressing somatostatin receptors, as well as efficacy and safety data from the Erasmus Phase 1/2 trial conducted in more than 1,200 patients with a wide range of NET indications including bronchial, pancreatic, foregut (excluding bronchial and pancreatic), midgut and hindgut. The NETTER-1 study met its primary endpoint by demonstrating that treatment with lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide was associated with a statistically significant and clinically meaningful risk reduction of 79% in disease progression or death versus a treatment with a double dose of Octreotide LAR (hazard ratio 0.21, 95% CI: 0.13-0.33; p<0.001). 2 Lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide, when administered concomitantly with a renal-protective agent, had low rates of grade three or four hematological toxicity, and no evidence of nephrotoxicity observed over the study time-frame (median follow-up time 14 months). USAN: lutetium Lu 177 dotatate/INN: lutetium (177Lu) oxodotreotide. Öberg K, Knigge U, Kwekkeboom D, Perren A. Neuroendocrine gastro-entero-pancreatic tumors: ESMO Clinical Practice Guidelines for diagnosis, treatment and follow-up. Annals of Oncology. 2012; 23 (Supplement 7):vii124–vii130. Strosberg J, El-Haddad G, Wolin E, Hendifar A, Yao J, Chasen B, Mittra E, Kunz PL, Kulke MH, Jacene H, et al. Phase 3 Trial of 177Lu-Dotatate for Midgut Neuroendocrine Tumors. N Engl J Med 2017; 376:125-35. DOI: 10.1056/NEJMoa1607427.


Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Presents at JMP Securities Life Sciences Conference 2017, Jun-21-2017 11:30 AM
Jun 17 17
Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Presents at JMP Securities Life Sciences Conference 2017, Jun-21-2017 11:30 AM. Venue: St. Regis Hotel, 2 East 55 Street, New York, New York, United States.


Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Presents at Cross-Border Deals Forum, Jun-20-2017 04:00 PM
Jun 15 17
Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Presents at Cross-Border Deals Forum, Jun-20-2017 04:00 PM. Venue: Bloomberg L.P.'s offices, 120 Park Avenue, Manhattan, New York, NY 10017, United States. Speakers: Edward Sturchio, Global General Counsel.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 Acticor Biotech SAS Europe Ademtech SA Europe Aelis Farma S.A.S. Europe Aenitis Technologies SAS Europe Alderys SAS Europe




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A., please visit www.adacap.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























Advanced Accelerator Applications - Wikipedia





















 






Advanced Accelerator Applications

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Advanced Accelerator Applications

Industry
Pharmaceuticals


Founded
2002 (2002)


Headquarters
Saint-Genis-Pouilly, France



Key people

Stefano Buono, CEO - Claudio Costamagna, Chairman


Products
GLUSCAN® DOPAVIEW® FLUOROCHOL NETSPOT® CARDIOGEN-82® NEUROLITE® MIBITEC LEUKOKIT®


Revenue
€109.3 million



Number of employees

>500


Website
adacap.com


Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) (NASDAQ: AAAP) is a pharmaceutical group specialised in the field of Molecular Nuclear Medicine.[1] The group operates in all three segments of Molecular Nuclear Medicine (PET, SPECT and Therapy) to diagnose and treat serious conditions in the fields of oncology (cancer), neurology, cardiology, infectious and inflammatory diseases.[2]
Molecular Nuclear Medicine is a medical specialty using small amounts of radioactive materials, called radiopharmaceuticals, to diagnose and treat disease. In nuclear medicine imaging, the radiopharmaceuticals are detected by special types of cameras (PET and SPECT) that work with computers to provide very precise pictures of the area of the body being imaged. Nuclear medicine can be used to treat certain types of cancer and other diseases.[3]
Molecular Imaging allows physicians to see how the body is functioning and to measure its chemical and biological processes. Nuclear medicine procedures can often identify abnormalities very early in the progress of a disease — long before many medical problems are apparent with other diagnostic tests.[4]



Contents


1 History
2 Products
3 Pipeline

3.1 Lutathera
3.2 Other


4 Millburn site
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
AAA was created in 2002 by Italian physicist Stefano Buono to exploit a patent from the European Organization for Nuclear Research (CERN).[5] Today AAA trades on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the ticker “AAAP.” The first day of trading was 11 November 2015.[6]
The group currently has 21 production and research & development facilities that manufacture both diagnostic and therapeutic Molecular Nuclear Medicine products, and over 530 employees in 13 countries (Belgium, France, Germany, Italy, Poland, Portugal, Spain, Switzerland, The Netherlands, UK, Israel, U.S. and Canada).
AAA’s founder and CEO is Stefano Buono. AAA's Board of Directors includes Steven Gannon, Christian Merle, Christine Mikail, Leopoldo Zambeletti, Stefano Buono, Kapil Dhingra,[7] François Nader and Claudio Costamagna.[8] Claudio Costamagna has served as Chairman since June 2012.[9]
AAA announced its full-year results for 2016, with sales of €109,3 million (+23% vs. 2015).
Products[edit]
AAA has a portfolio of diagnostic and therapeutic applications and products in the fields of Molecular Imaging and Therapy. [10] The group’s portfolio of radiopharmaceuticals includes radioactive agents for positron emission tomography (PET) imaging as well as single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) diagnostic products.[11]
Pipeline[edit]
AAA has a broad pipeline of products in development, including several theragnostic pairings for oncology indications.
Lutathera[edit]
The company's lead product in development (in regulatory review), Lutathera, a lutetium-177 (Lu-177) labeled somatostatin analogue peptide, is a theragnostic cancer product being developed to treat certain gastro-entero pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs). It selectively targets over-expressed somatostatin receptors while also giving off gamma emissions to allow physicians to visualize where in the body both the drug and the tumor are. Lutathera is currently administered on a compassionate use and named patient basis for the treatment of NETs in ten European countries and the U.S.[12]
Other[edit]
Somakit-Tate (now marketed as NETSPOT®) and SomaKit TOC™ are novel kits for radiolabeling somatostatin analogue peptides to help diagnose somatostatin receptor-positive NET lesions. Each kit has received orphan drug designation from both the EMA and the FDA.[13][14] In June 2016, the FDA approved NETSPOT® (Somakit-Tate) and in December 2016, the European Commission approved Somakit-TOC™.
Millburn site[edit]
In 2016, AAA opened a light manufacturing and distribution site in Millburn, NJ, a residential town in North Jersey.[15] When the site was first purchased, it caused substantial concerns among local residents.[16] Per the requests of Millburn Residents, the Township Committee hired a nuclear/radiology expert to re-assess the appropriateness of opening a radioactive manufacturing site in the residential area.[17] The expert concluded that the proposed operations at AAA are safe and pose no hazard to the citizens of Millburn.[18][19]
References[edit]


^ PrivateEquityWire, "Advanced Accelerator Applications completes fundraising", Feb 18th, 2014
^ Il Sole 24 Ore, “Dal Cern and Biopark canavese”, March 12th, 2014
^ SNMMI, "About Nuclear Medicine & Molecular Imaging"
^ SNMMI, "Glossary of Molecular Imaging Terms"
^ AdnKronos,“ Research: from Rubbia to AAA, great success for an Italian physicist with European company”. March 19th, 2010.
^ Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November."
^ Kathy Mahdoubi. Molecular Imaging, "Advanced Accelerator Applications keen on board consult from Kapil Dhingra". May 7, 2014.
^ Market Watch, "Kapil Dhingra, Former Head of Roche Oncology, Joins AAA Board of Directors", April 29th, 2014
^ MF Dow Jones, “Claudio Costamagna new Chairman of AAA”, June 21st, 2012
^ Advanced Accelerator Applications Nuclear Medicine Glossary
^ Medicaldevicedaily.com, “AAA to increase clinical trials of MNM diagnostic products”, Febr 19th, 2014
^ "Expanded Access Protocol for Therapeutic Use of 177Lu-DOTA0-Tyr3-Octreotate in Patients With Inoperable, Somatostatin Receptor Positive, Midgut Carcinoid Tumors, Progressive Under Somatostatin Analogue Therapy".
^ Devicespace.com, “Advanced Accelerator Applications Receives Orphan Drug Designation From FDA And European Medicines Agency For Gallium-68 DOTATATE For Use In Patients With Gastro-Entero-Pancreatic Neuroendocrine Tumors”. 3 March 2014.
^ News Medical, "AAA gets orphan drug designation status for radiopharmaceutical, Gallium-68 DOTATATE". 4 March 2014.
^ Danielle Desisto. "Millburn manufacturing site safely produces cancer-fighting drug".
^ "Concerns raised about proposed cancer drug factory in Millburn"
^ Cecilia Levine. "Nuclear meds expert hired". The Record. 7 May 2015.
^ Jonathan Sym. "Advanced Accelerator Application Investigation Results: Risks Are “Close To Zero Without Being Zero” Says Expert". Tap Into Millburn/Short Hills. 18 February 2016.
^ Harry Trumbore. "Expert says radiopharmaceutical factory proposed for Millburn is safe" . 11 February 2016


External links[edit]

Official website
Global Radiopharmaceutical Market 2012-2016
Da Costa Branquinho E. et al. 2013. Radiosynthesis and in vivo evaluation of fluorinated huprine derivates as PET radiotracers of acetylcholinesterase. Nuclear Medicine and Biology. March 2013
Priem T. et al. 2012. Synthesis and reactivity of a bis-sultone cross-linker for peptide conjugation and 18F-radiolabelling via unusual "double click" approach.Org Biomol Chem. 10(5):1068-78
Remetti R. et al. 2011. Monte Carlo simulation and radiometric characterization of proton irradiated 18°-H2O for the treatment of the waste streams originated from 18F-FDG synthesis process . Applied Radiation and Isotopes 69 (2011) 1046–1051
Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November.
Seeking Alpha IPO Preview: Advanced Accelerator Applications





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Advanced_Accelerator_Applications&oldid=790785604"					
Categories: Pharmaceutical companies of FranceFrench companies established in 2002Pharmaceutical companies established in 2002Hidden categories: Pages using infobox company with unsupported parametersOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolFrançais 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 01:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Advanced Accelerator Applications - Wikipedia





















 






Advanced Accelerator Applications

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Advanced Accelerator Applications

Industry
Pharmaceuticals


Founded
2002 (2002)


Headquarters
Saint-Genis-Pouilly, France



Key people

Stefano Buono, CEO - Claudio Costamagna, Chairman


Products
GLUSCAN® DOPAVIEW® FLUOROCHOL NETSPOT® CARDIOGEN-82® NEUROLITE® MIBITEC LEUKOKIT®


Revenue
€109.3 million



Number of employees

>500


Website
adacap.com


Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) (NASDAQ: AAAP) is a pharmaceutical group specialised in the field of Molecular Nuclear Medicine.[1] The group operates in all three segments of Molecular Nuclear Medicine (PET, SPECT and Therapy) to diagnose and treat serious conditions in the fields of oncology (cancer), neurology, cardiology, infectious and inflammatory diseases.[2]
Molecular Nuclear Medicine is a medical specialty using small amounts of radioactive materials, called radiopharmaceuticals, to diagnose and treat disease. In nuclear medicine imaging, the radiopharmaceuticals are detected by special types of cameras (PET and SPECT) that work with computers to provide very precise pictures of the area of the body being imaged. Nuclear medicine can be used to treat certain types of cancer and other diseases.[3]
Molecular Imaging allows physicians to see how the body is functioning and to measure its chemical and biological processes. Nuclear medicine procedures can often identify abnormalities very early in the progress of a disease — long before many medical problems are apparent with other diagnostic tests.[4]



Contents


1 History
2 Products
3 Pipeline

3.1 Lutathera
3.2 Other


4 Millburn site
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
AAA was created in 2002 by Italian physicist Stefano Buono to exploit a patent from the European Organization for Nuclear Research (CERN).[5] Today AAA trades on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the ticker “AAAP.” The first day of trading was 11 November 2015.[6]
The group currently has 21 production and research & development facilities that manufacture both diagnostic and therapeutic Molecular Nuclear Medicine products, and over 530 employees in 13 countries (Belgium, France, Germany, Italy, Poland, Portugal, Spain, Switzerland, The Netherlands, UK, Israel, U.S. and Canada).
AAA’s founder and CEO is Stefano Buono. AAA's Board of Directors includes Steven Gannon, Christian Merle, Christine Mikail, Leopoldo Zambeletti, Stefano Buono, Kapil Dhingra,[7] François Nader and Claudio Costamagna.[8] Claudio Costamagna has served as Chairman since June 2012.[9]
AAA announced its full-year results for 2016, with sales of €109,3 million (+23% vs. 2015).
Products[edit]
AAA has a portfolio of diagnostic and therapeutic applications and products in the fields of Molecular Imaging and Therapy. [10] The group’s portfolio of radiopharmaceuticals includes radioactive agents for positron emission tomography (PET) imaging as well as single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) diagnostic products.[11]
Pipeline[edit]
AAA has a broad pipeline of products in development, including several theragnostic pairings for oncology indications.
Lutathera[edit]
The company's lead product in development (in regulatory review), Lutathera, a lutetium-177 (Lu-177) labeled somatostatin analogue peptide, is a theragnostic cancer product being developed to treat certain gastro-entero pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs). It selectively targets over-expressed somatostatin receptors while also giving off gamma emissions to allow physicians to visualize where in the body both the drug and the tumor are. Lutathera is currently administered on a compassionate use and named patient basis for the treatment of NETs in ten European countries and the U.S.[12]
Other[edit]
Somakit-Tate (now marketed as NETSPOT®) and SomaKit TOC™ are novel kits for radiolabeling somatostatin analogue peptides to help diagnose somatostatin receptor-positive NET lesions. Each kit has received orphan drug designation from both the EMA and the FDA.[13][14] In June 2016, the FDA approved NETSPOT® (Somakit-Tate) and in December 2016, the European Commission approved Somakit-TOC™.
Millburn site[edit]
In 2016, AAA opened a light manufacturing and distribution site in Millburn, NJ, a residential town in North Jersey.[15] When the site was first purchased, it caused substantial concerns among local residents.[16] Per the requests of Millburn Residents, the Township Committee hired a nuclear/radiology expert to re-assess the appropriateness of opening a radioactive manufacturing site in the residential area.[17] The expert concluded that the proposed operations at AAA are safe and pose no hazard to the citizens of Millburn.[18][19]
References[edit]


^ PrivateEquityWire, "Advanced Accelerator Applications completes fundraising", Feb 18th, 2014
^ Il Sole 24 Ore, “Dal Cern and Biopark canavese”, March 12th, 2014
^ SNMMI, "About Nuclear Medicine & Molecular Imaging"
^ SNMMI, "Glossary of Molecular Imaging Terms"
^ AdnKronos,“ Research: from Rubbia to AAA, great success for an Italian physicist with European company”. March 19th, 2010.
^ Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November."
^ Kathy Mahdoubi. Molecular Imaging, "Advanced Accelerator Applications keen on board consult from Kapil Dhingra". May 7, 2014.
^ Market Watch, "Kapil Dhingra, Former Head of Roche Oncology, Joins AAA Board of Directors", April 29th, 2014
^ MF Dow Jones, “Claudio Costamagna new Chairman of AAA”, June 21st, 2012
^ Advanced Accelerator Applications Nuclear Medicine Glossary
^ Medicaldevicedaily.com, “AAA to increase clinical trials of MNM diagnostic products”, Febr 19th, 2014
^ "Expanded Access Protocol for Therapeutic Use of 177Lu-DOTA0-Tyr3-Octreotate in Patients With Inoperable, Somatostatin Receptor Positive, Midgut Carcinoid Tumors, Progressive Under Somatostatin Analogue Therapy".
^ Devicespace.com, “Advanced Accelerator Applications Receives Orphan Drug Designation From FDA And European Medicines Agency For Gallium-68 DOTATATE For Use In Patients With Gastro-Entero-Pancreatic Neuroendocrine Tumors”. 3 March 2014.
^ News Medical, "AAA gets orphan drug designation status for radiopharmaceutical, Gallium-68 DOTATATE". 4 March 2014.
^ Danielle Desisto. "Millburn manufacturing site safely produces cancer-fighting drug".
^ "Concerns raised about proposed cancer drug factory in Millburn"
^ Cecilia Levine. "Nuclear meds expert hired". The Record. 7 May 2015.
^ Jonathan Sym. "Advanced Accelerator Application Investigation Results: Risks Are “Close To Zero Without Being Zero” Says Expert". Tap Into Millburn/Short Hills. 18 February 2016.
^ Harry Trumbore. "Expert says radiopharmaceutical factory proposed for Millburn is safe" . 11 February 2016


External links[edit]

Official website
Global Radiopharmaceutical Market 2012-2016
Da Costa Branquinho E. et al. 2013. Radiosynthesis and in vivo evaluation of fluorinated huprine derivates as PET radiotracers of acetylcholinesterase. Nuclear Medicine and Biology. March 2013
Priem T. et al. 2012. Synthesis and reactivity of a bis-sultone cross-linker for peptide conjugation and 18F-radiolabelling via unusual "double click" approach.Org Biomol Chem. 10(5):1068-78
Remetti R. et al. 2011. Monte Carlo simulation and radiometric characterization of proton irradiated 18°-H2O for the treatment of the waste streams originated from 18F-FDG synthesis process . Applied Radiation and Isotopes 69 (2011) 1046–1051
Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November.
Seeking Alpha IPO Preview: Advanced Accelerator Applications





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Advanced_Accelerator_Applications&oldid=790785604"					
Categories: Pharmaceutical companies of FranceFrench companies established in 2002Pharmaceutical companies established in 2002Hidden categories: Pages using infobox company with unsupported parametersOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolFrançais 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 01:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Advanced Accelerator Applications - Wikipedia





















 






Advanced Accelerator Applications

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Advanced Accelerator Applications

Industry
Pharmaceuticals


Founded
2002 (2002)


Headquarters
Saint-Genis-Pouilly, France



Key people

Stefano Buono, CEO - Claudio Costamagna, Chairman


Products
GLUSCAN® DOPAVIEW® FLUOROCHOL NETSPOT® CARDIOGEN-82® NEUROLITE® MIBITEC LEUKOKIT®


Revenue
€109.3 million



Number of employees

>500


Website
adacap.com


Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) (NASDAQ: AAAP) is a pharmaceutical group specialised in the field of Molecular Nuclear Medicine.[1] The group operates in all three segments of Molecular Nuclear Medicine (PET, SPECT and Therapy) to diagnose and treat serious conditions in the fields of oncology (cancer), neurology, cardiology, infectious and inflammatory diseases.[2]
Molecular Nuclear Medicine is a medical specialty using small amounts of radioactive materials, called radiopharmaceuticals, to diagnose and treat disease. In nuclear medicine imaging, the radiopharmaceuticals are detected by special types of cameras (PET and SPECT) that work with computers to provide very precise pictures of the area of the body being imaged. Nuclear medicine can be used to treat certain types of cancer and other diseases.[3]
Molecular Imaging allows physicians to see how the body is functioning and to measure its chemical and biological processes. Nuclear medicine procedures can often identify abnormalities very early in the progress of a disease — long before many medical problems are apparent with other diagnostic tests.[4]



Contents


1 History
2 Products
3 Pipeline

3.1 Lutathera
3.2 Other


4 Millburn site
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
AAA was created in 2002 by Italian physicist Stefano Buono to exploit a patent from the European Organization for Nuclear Research (CERN).[5] Today AAA trades on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the ticker “AAAP.” The first day of trading was 11 November 2015.[6]
The group currently has 21 production and research & development facilities that manufacture both diagnostic and therapeutic Molecular Nuclear Medicine products, and over 530 employees in 13 countries (Belgium, France, Germany, Italy, Poland, Portugal, Spain, Switzerland, The Netherlands, UK, Israel, U.S. and Canada).
AAA’s founder and CEO is Stefano Buono. AAA's Board of Directors includes Steven Gannon, Christian Merle, Christine Mikail, Leopoldo Zambeletti, Stefano Buono, Kapil Dhingra,[7] François Nader and Claudio Costamagna.[8] Claudio Costamagna has served as Chairman since June 2012.[9]
AAA announced its full-year results for 2016, with sales of €109,3 million (+23% vs. 2015).
Products[edit]
AAA has a portfolio of diagnostic and therapeutic applications and products in the fields of Molecular Imaging and Therapy. [10] The group’s portfolio of radiopharmaceuticals includes radioactive agents for positron emission tomography (PET) imaging as well as single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) diagnostic products.[11]
Pipeline[edit]
AAA has a broad pipeline of products in development, including several theragnostic pairings for oncology indications.
Lutathera[edit]
The company's lead product in development (in regulatory review), Lutathera, a lutetium-177 (Lu-177) labeled somatostatin analogue peptide, is a theragnostic cancer product being developed to treat certain gastro-entero pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs). It selectively targets over-expressed somatostatin receptors while also giving off gamma emissions to allow physicians to visualize where in the body both the drug and the tumor are. Lutathera is currently administered on a compassionate use and named patient basis for the treatment of NETs in ten European countries and the U.S.[12]
Other[edit]
Somakit-Tate (now marketed as NETSPOT®) and SomaKit TOC™ are novel kits for radiolabeling somatostatin analogue peptides to help diagnose somatostatin receptor-positive NET lesions. Each kit has received orphan drug designation from both the EMA and the FDA.[13][14] In June 2016, the FDA approved NETSPOT® (Somakit-Tate) and in December 2016, the European Commission approved Somakit-TOC™.
Millburn site[edit]
In 2016, AAA opened a light manufacturing and distribution site in Millburn, NJ, a residential town in North Jersey.[15] When the site was first purchased, it caused substantial concerns among local residents.[16] Per the requests of Millburn Residents, the Township Committee hired a nuclear/radiology expert to re-assess the appropriateness of opening a radioactive manufacturing site in the residential area.[17] The expert concluded that the proposed operations at AAA are safe and pose no hazard to the citizens of Millburn.[18][19]
References[edit]


^ PrivateEquityWire, "Advanced Accelerator Applications completes fundraising", Feb 18th, 2014
^ Il Sole 24 Ore, “Dal Cern and Biopark canavese”, March 12th, 2014
^ SNMMI, "About Nuclear Medicine & Molecular Imaging"
^ SNMMI, "Glossary of Molecular Imaging Terms"
^ AdnKronos,“ Research: from Rubbia to AAA, great success for an Italian physicist with European company”. March 19th, 2010.
^ Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November."
^ Kathy Mahdoubi. Molecular Imaging, "Advanced Accelerator Applications keen on board consult from Kapil Dhingra". May 7, 2014.
^ Market Watch, "Kapil Dhingra, Former Head of Roche Oncology, Joins AAA Board of Directors", April 29th, 2014
^ MF Dow Jones, “Claudio Costamagna new Chairman of AAA”, June 21st, 2012
^ Advanced Accelerator Applications Nuclear Medicine Glossary
^ Medicaldevicedaily.com, “AAA to increase clinical trials of MNM diagnostic products”, Febr 19th, 2014
^ "Expanded Access Protocol for Therapeutic Use of 177Lu-DOTA0-Tyr3-Octreotate in Patients With Inoperable, Somatostatin Receptor Positive, Midgut Carcinoid Tumors, Progressive Under Somatostatin Analogue Therapy".
^ Devicespace.com, “Advanced Accelerator Applications Receives Orphan Drug Designation From FDA And European Medicines Agency For Gallium-68 DOTATATE For Use In Patients With Gastro-Entero-Pancreatic Neuroendocrine Tumors”. 3 March 2014.
^ News Medical, "AAA gets orphan drug designation status for radiopharmaceutical, Gallium-68 DOTATATE". 4 March 2014.
^ Danielle Desisto. "Millburn manufacturing site safely produces cancer-fighting drug".
^ "Concerns raised about proposed cancer drug factory in Millburn"
^ Cecilia Levine. "Nuclear meds expert hired". The Record. 7 May 2015.
^ Jonathan Sym. "Advanced Accelerator Application Investigation Results: Risks Are “Close To Zero Without Being Zero” Says Expert". Tap Into Millburn/Short Hills. 18 February 2016.
^ Harry Trumbore. "Expert says radiopharmaceutical factory proposed for Millburn is safe" . 11 February 2016


External links[edit]

Official website
Global Radiopharmaceutical Market 2012-2016
Da Costa Branquinho E. et al. 2013. Radiosynthesis and in vivo evaluation of fluorinated huprine derivates as PET radiotracers of acetylcholinesterase. Nuclear Medicine and Biology. March 2013
Priem T. et al. 2012. Synthesis and reactivity of a bis-sultone cross-linker for peptide conjugation and 18F-radiolabelling via unusual "double click" approach.Org Biomol Chem. 10(5):1068-78
Remetti R. et al. 2011. Monte Carlo simulation and radiometric characterization of proton irradiated 18°-H2O for the treatment of the waste streams originated from 18F-FDG synthesis process . Applied Radiation and Isotopes 69 (2011) 1046–1051
Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November.
Seeking Alpha IPO Preview: Advanced Accelerator Applications





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Advanced_Accelerator_Applications&oldid=790785604"					
Categories: Pharmaceutical companies of FranceFrench companies established in 2002Pharmaceutical companies established in 2002Hidden categories: Pages using infobox company with unsupported parametersOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolFrançais 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 01:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Advanced Accelerator Applications - Wikipedia





















 






Advanced Accelerator Applications

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Advanced Accelerator Applications

Industry
Pharmaceuticals


Founded
2002 (2002)


Headquarters
Saint-Genis-Pouilly, France



Key people

Stefano Buono, CEO - Claudio Costamagna, Chairman


Products
GLUSCAN® DOPAVIEW® FLUOROCHOL NETSPOT® CARDIOGEN-82® NEUROLITE® MIBITEC LEUKOKIT®


Revenue
€109.3 million



Number of employees

>500


Website
adacap.com


Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) (NASDAQ: AAAP) is a pharmaceutical group specialised in the field of Molecular Nuclear Medicine.[1] The group operates in all three segments of Molecular Nuclear Medicine (PET, SPECT and Therapy) to diagnose and treat serious conditions in the fields of oncology (cancer), neurology, cardiology, infectious and inflammatory diseases.[2]
Molecular Nuclear Medicine is a medical specialty using small amounts of radioactive materials, called radiopharmaceuticals, to diagnose and treat disease. In nuclear medicine imaging, the radiopharmaceuticals are detected by special types of cameras (PET and SPECT) that work with computers to provide very precise pictures of the area of the body being imaged. Nuclear medicine can be used to treat certain types of cancer and other diseases.[3]
Molecular Imaging allows physicians to see how the body is functioning and to measure its chemical and biological processes. Nuclear medicine procedures can often identify abnormalities very early in the progress of a disease — long before many medical problems are apparent with other diagnostic tests.[4]



Contents


1 History
2 Products
3 Pipeline

3.1 Lutathera
3.2 Other


4 Millburn site
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
AAA was created in 2002 by Italian physicist Stefano Buono to exploit a patent from the European Organization for Nuclear Research (CERN).[5] Today AAA trades on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the ticker “AAAP.” The first day of trading was 11 November 2015.[6]
The group currently has 21 production and research & development facilities that manufacture both diagnostic and therapeutic Molecular Nuclear Medicine products, and over 530 employees in 13 countries (Belgium, France, Germany, Italy, Poland, Portugal, Spain, Switzerland, The Netherlands, UK, Israel, U.S. and Canada).
AAA’s founder and CEO is Stefano Buono. AAA's Board of Directors includes Steven Gannon, Christian Merle, Christine Mikail, Leopoldo Zambeletti, Stefano Buono, Kapil Dhingra,[7] François Nader and Claudio Costamagna.[8] Claudio Costamagna has served as Chairman since June 2012.[9]
AAA announced its full-year results for 2016, with sales of €109,3 million (+23% vs. 2015).
Products[edit]
AAA has a portfolio of diagnostic and therapeutic applications and products in the fields of Molecular Imaging and Therapy. [10] The group’s portfolio of radiopharmaceuticals includes radioactive agents for positron emission tomography (PET) imaging as well as single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) diagnostic products.[11]
Pipeline[edit]
AAA has a broad pipeline of products in development, including several theragnostic pairings for oncology indications.
Lutathera[edit]
The company's lead product in development (in regulatory review), Lutathera, a lutetium-177 (Lu-177) labeled somatostatin analogue peptide, is a theragnostic cancer product being developed to treat certain gastro-entero pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs). It selectively targets over-expressed somatostatin receptors while also giving off gamma emissions to allow physicians to visualize where in the body both the drug and the tumor are. Lutathera is currently administered on a compassionate use and named patient basis for the treatment of NETs in ten European countries and the U.S.[12]
Other[edit]
Somakit-Tate (now marketed as NETSPOT®) and SomaKit TOC™ are novel kits for radiolabeling somatostatin analogue peptides to help diagnose somatostatin receptor-positive NET lesions. Each kit has received orphan drug designation from both the EMA and the FDA.[13][14] In June 2016, the FDA approved NETSPOT® (Somakit-Tate) and in December 2016, the European Commission approved Somakit-TOC™.
Millburn site[edit]
In 2016, AAA opened a light manufacturing and distribution site in Millburn, NJ, a residential town in North Jersey.[15] When the site was first purchased, it caused substantial concerns among local residents.[16] Per the requests of Millburn Residents, the Township Committee hired a nuclear/radiology expert to re-assess the appropriateness of opening a radioactive manufacturing site in the residential area.[17] The expert concluded that the proposed operations at AAA are safe and pose no hazard to the citizens of Millburn.[18][19]
References[edit]


^ PrivateEquityWire, "Advanced Accelerator Applications completes fundraising", Feb 18th, 2014
^ Il Sole 24 Ore, “Dal Cern and Biopark canavese”, March 12th, 2014
^ SNMMI, "About Nuclear Medicine & Molecular Imaging"
^ SNMMI, "Glossary of Molecular Imaging Terms"
^ AdnKronos,“ Research: from Rubbia to AAA, great success for an Italian physicist with European company”. March 19th, 2010.
^ Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November."
^ Kathy Mahdoubi. Molecular Imaging, "Advanced Accelerator Applications keen on board consult from Kapil Dhingra". May 7, 2014.
^ Market Watch, "Kapil Dhingra, Former Head of Roche Oncology, Joins AAA Board of Directors", April 29th, 2014
^ MF Dow Jones, “Claudio Costamagna new Chairman of AAA”, June 21st, 2012
^ Advanced Accelerator Applications Nuclear Medicine Glossary
^ Medicaldevicedaily.com, “AAA to increase clinical trials of MNM diagnostic products”, Febr 19th, 2014
^ "Expanded Access Protocol for Therapeutic Use of 177Lu-DOTA0-Tyr3-Octreotate in Patients With Inoperable, Somatostatin Receptor Positive, Midgut Carcinoid Tumors, Progressive Under Somatostatin Analogue Therapy".
^ Devicespace.com, “Advanced Accelerator Applications Receives Orphan Drug Designation From FDA And European Medicines Agency For Gallium-68 DOTATATE For Use In Patients With Gastro-Entero-Pancreatic Neuroendocrine Tumors”. 3 March 2014.
^ News Medical, "AAA gets orphan drug designation status for radiopharmaceutical, Gallium-68 DOTATATE". 4 March 2014.
^ Danielle Desisto. "Millburn manufacturing site safely produces cancer-fighting drug".
^ "Concerns raised about proposed cancer drug factory in Millburn"
^ Cecilia Levine. "Nuclear meds expert hired". The Record. 7 May 2015.
^ Jonathan Sym. "Advanced Accelerator Application Investigation Results: Risks Are “Close To Zero Without Being Zero” Says Expert". Tap Into Millburn/Short Hills. 18 February 2016.
^ Harry Trumbore. "Expert says radiopharmaceutical factory proposed for Millburn is safe" . 11 February 2016


External links[edit]

Official website
Global Radiopharmaceutical Market 2012-2016
Da Costa Branquinho E. et al. 2013. Radiosynthesis and in vivo evaluation of fluorinated huprine derivates as PET radiotracers of acetylcholinesterase. Nuclear Medicine and Biology. March 2013
Priem T. et al. 2012. Synthesis and reactivity of a bis-sultone cross-linker for peptide conjugation and 18F-radiolabelling via unusual "double click" approach.Org Biomol Chem. 10(5):1068-78
Remetti R. et al. 2011. Monte Carlo simulation and radiometric characterization of proton irradiated 18°-H2O for the treatment of the waste streams originated from 18F-FDG synthesis process . Applied Radiation and Isotopes 69 (2011) 1046–1051
Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November.
Seeking Alpha IPO Preview: Advanced Accelerator Applications





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Advanced_Accelerator_Applications&oldid=790785604"					
Categories: Pharmaceutical companies of FranceFrench companies established in 2002Pharmaceutical companies established in 2002Hidden categories: Pages using infobox company with unsupported parametersOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolFrançais 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 01:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Advanced Accelerator Applications - Wikipedia





















 






Advanced Accelerator Applications

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Advanced Accelerator Applications

Industry
Pharmaceuticals


Founded
2002 (2002)


Headquarters
Saint-Genis-Pouilly, France



Key people

Stefano Buono, CEO - Claudio Costamagna, Chairman


Products
GLUSCAN® DOPAVIEW® FLUOROCHOL NETSPOT® CARDIOGEN-82® NEUROLITE® MIBITEC LEUKOKIT®


Revenue
€109.3 million



Number of employees

>500


Website
adacap.com


Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) (NASDAQ: AAAP) is a pharmaceutical group specialised in the field of Molecular Nuclear Medicine.[1] The group operates in all three segments of Molecular Nuclear Medicine (PET, SPECT and Therapy) to diagnose and treat serious conditions in the fields of oncology (cancer), neurology, cardiology, infectious and inflammatory diseases.[2]
Molecular Nuclear Medicine is a medical specialty using small amounts of radioactive materials, called radiopharmaceuticals, to diagnose and treat disease. In nuclear medicine imaging, the radiopharmaceuticals are detected by special types of cameras (PET and SPECT) that work with computers to provide very precise pictures of the area of the body being imaged. Nuclear medicine can be used to treat certain types of cancer and other diseases.[3]
Molecular Imaging allows physicians to see how the body is functioning and to measure its chemical and biological processes. Nuclear medicine procedures can often identify abnormalities very early in the progress of a disease — long before many medical problems are apparent with other diagnostic tests.[4]



Contents


1 History
2 Products
3 Pipeline

3.1 Lutathera
3.2 Other


4 Millburn site
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
AAA was created in 2002 by Italian physicist Stefano Buono to exploit a patent from the European Organization for Nuclear Research (CERN).[5] Today AAA trades on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the ticker “AAAP.” The first day of trading was 11 November 2015.[6]
The group currently has 21 production and research & development facilities that manufacture both diagnostic and therapeutic Molecular Nuclear Medicine products, and over 530 employees in 13 countries (Belgium, France, Germany, Italy, Poland, Portugal, Spain, Switzerland, The Netherlands, UK, Israel, U.S. and Canada).
AAA’s founder and CEO is Stefano Buono. AAA's Board of Directors includes Steven Gannon, Christian Merle, Christine Mikail, Leopoldo Zambeletti, Stefano Buono, Kapil Dhingra,[7] François Nader and Claudio Costamagna.[8] Claudio Costamagna has served as Chairman since June 2012.[9]
AAA announced its full-year results for 2016, with sales of €109,3 million (+23% vs. 2015).
Products[edit]
AAA has a portfolio of diagnostic and therapeutic applications and products in the fields of Molecular Imaging and Therapy. [10] The group’s portfolio of radiopharmaceuticals includes radioactive agents for positron emission tomography (PET) imaging as well as single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) diagnostic products.[11]
Pipeline[edit]
AAA has a broad pipeline of products in development, including several theragnostic pairings for oncology indications.
Lutathera[edit]
The company's lead product in development (in regulatory review), Lutathera, a lutetium-177 (Lu-177) labeled somatostatin analogue peptide, is a theragnostic cancer product being developed to treat certain gastro-entero pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs). It selectively targets over-expressed somatostatin receptors while also giving off gamma emissions to allow physicians to visualize where in the body both the drug and the tumor are. Lutathera is currently administered on a compassionate use and named patient basis for the treatment of NETs in ten European countries and the U.S.[12]
Other[edit]
Somakit-Tate (now marketed as NETSPOT®) and SomaKit TOC™ are novel kits for radiolabeling somatostatin analogue peptides to help diagnose somatostatin receptor-positive NET lesions. Each kit has received orphan drug designation from both the EMA and the FDA.[13][14] In June 2016, the FDA approved NETSPOT® (Somakit-Tate) and in December 2016, the European Commission approved Somakit-TOC™.
Millburn site[edit]
In 2016, AAA opened a light manufacturing and distribution site in Millburn, NJ, a residential town in North Jersey.[15] When the site was first purchased, it caused substantial concerns among local residents.[16] Per the requests of Millburn Residents, the Township Committee hired a nuclear/radiology expert to re-assess the appropriateness of opening a radioactive manufacturing site in the residential area.[17] The expert concluded that the proposed operations at AAA are safe and pose no hazard to the citizens of Millburn.[18][19]
References[edit]


^ PrivateEquityWire, "Advanced Accelerator Applications completes fundraising", Feb 18th, 2014
^ Il Sole 24 Ore, “Dal Cern and Biopark canavese”, March 12th, 2014
^ SNMMI, "About Nuclear Medicine & Molecular Imaging"
^ SNMMI, "Glossary of Molecular Imaging Terms"
^ AdnKronos,“ Research: from Rubbia to AAA, great success for an Italian physicist with European company”. March 19th, 2010.
^ Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November."
^ Kathy Mahdoubi. Molecular Imaging, "Advanced Accelerator Applications keen on board consult from Kapil Dhingra". May 7, 2014.
^ Market Watch, "Kapil Dhingra, Former Head of Roche Oncology, Joins AAA Board of Directors", April 29th, 2014
^ MF Dow Jones, “Claudio Costamagna new Chairman of AAA”, June 21st, 2012
^ Advanced Accelerator Applications Nuclear Medicine Glossary
^ Medicaldevicedaily.com, “AAA to increase clinical trials of MNM diagnostic products”, Febr 19th, 2014
^ "Expanded Access Protocol for Therapeutic Use of 177Lu-DOTA0-Tyr3-Octreotate in Patients With Inoperable, Somatostatin Receptor Positive, Midgut Carcinoid Tumors, Progressive Under Somatostatin Analogue Therapy".
^ Devicespace.com, “Advanced Accelerator Applications Receives Orphan Drug Designation From FDA And European Medicines Agency For Gallium-68 DOTATATE For Use In Patients With Gastro-Entero-Pancreatic Neuroendocrine Tumors”. 3 March 2014.
^ News Medical, "AAA gets orphan drug designation status for radiopharmaceutical, Gallium-68 DOTATATE". 4 March 2014.
^ Danielle Desisto. "Millburn manufacturing site safely produces cancer-fighting drug".
^ "Concerns raised about proposed cancer drug factory in Millburn"
^ Cecilia Levine. "Nuclear meds expert hired". The Record. 7 May 2015.
^ Jonathan Sym. "Advanced Accelerator Application Investigation Results: Risks Are “Close To Zero Without Being Zero” Says Expert". Tap Into Millburn/Short Hills. 18 February 2016.
^ Harry Trumbore. "Expert says radiopharmaceutical factory proposed for Millburn is safe" . 11 February 2016


External links[edit]

Official website
Global Radiopharmaceutical Market 2012-2016
Da Costa Branquinho E. et al. 2013. Radiosynthesis and in vivo evaluation of fluorinated huprine derivates as PET radiotracers of acetylcholinesterase. Nuclear Medicine and Biology. March 2013
Priem T. et al. 2012. Synthesis and reactivity of a bis-sultone cross-linker for peptide conjugation and 18F-radiolabelling via unusual "double click" approach.Org Biomol Chem. 10(5):1068-78
Remetti R. et al. 2011. Monte Carlo simulation and radiometric characterization of proton irradiated 18°-H2O for the treatment of the waste streams originated from 18F-FDG synthesis process . Applied Radiation and Isotopes 69 (2011) 1046–1051
Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November.
Seeking Alpha IPO Preview: Advanced Accelerator Applications





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Advanced_Accelerator_Applications&oldid=790785604"					
Categories: Pharmaceutical companies of FranceFrench companies established in 2002Pharmaceutical companies established in 2002Hidden categories: Pages using infobox company with unsupported parametersOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolFrançais 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 01:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 














Advanced Accelerator Applications S.a. - AAAP - Stock Price Today - Zacks






























Quote Overview


Stock Activity



Open
42.21


Day Low
40.00


Day High
42.41


52 Wk Low
23.50


52 Wk High
43.50


Avg. Volume
85,384


Market Cap
1.68 B


Dividend
0.00 ( 0.00%)


Beta
0.48





Key Earnings Data



Earnings ESP 
0.00%


Most Accurate Est
-0.13


Current Qtr Est
-0.13


Current Yr Est
-0.61


Exp Earnings Date
8/30/17


Prior Year EPS
-0.34


Exp EPS Growth (3-5yr)NA


Forward PE
NA


PEG Ratio
NA













Medical » Medical - Drugs





Zacks Earnings ESP (Expected Surprise Prediction) looks to find earnings surprises by focusing on the most recent analyst revisions. This is done because, generally speaking, if an analyst reevaluates their earnings estimate right before an earnings release, it means that they have fresh information which could potentially be more accurate than what analysts thought about a company two or three months ago.
The crux of this approach is comparing the Most Accurate Estimate to the Zacks Consensus Estimate, although the Zacks Rank is also an important feature of the ESP metric. Combining these two can help investors find stocks that are ready to beat the consensus at their next report, and hopefully surge higher in price too.
In fact, when combining a Zacks Rank #3 or better and a positive Earnings ESP, stocks produced a positive surprise 70% of the time. And best of all, by using these parameters, investors have seen 28.3% annual returns on average, according to our 10 year backtest.
Visit the Earnings ESP Center
See the Full List of Stocks To Beat Earnings





Research Report for AAAP



All Zacks’ Analyst Reports



Premium Research for AAAP





Zacks Rank


 Buy 2



Zacks Industry Rank
 Top 48%(126 out of 265)


Zacks Sector Rank
 Bottom 25% (12  out of 16) 



Style Scores

F Value | F Growth | F Momentum | F VGM




Earnings ESP


0.00%



Research Report for AAAP

Snapshot





This is our short term rating system that serves as a timeliness indicator for stocks over the next 1 to 3 months. How good is it? See rankings and related performance below. 



Zacks Rank
Definition
Annualized Return




1
Strong Buy
25.71%


2
Buy
18.12%


3
Hold
9.91%


4
Sell
5.49%


5
Strong Sell
2.29%


S&P
500
9.79%



Zacks Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Rank
Zacks Rank Home - All Zacks Rank resources in one place
Zacks Premium - The only way to get access to the Zacks Rank


The Style Scores  are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style.
The scores are based on the trading styles of Value, Growth, and Momentum. There's also a VGM Score ('V' for Value, 'G' for Growth and 'M' for Momentum), which combines the weighted average of the individual style scores into one score.



Value Score
A


Growth Score
A


Momentum Score
A


VGM Score
A



Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A, is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B in your personal trading style.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Zacks Industry Rank assigns a rating to each of the 265 X (Expanded) Industries based on their average Zacks Rank.
An industry with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
The industry with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top industry (1 out of 265), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Industries. The industry with the worst average Zacks Rank (265 out of 265) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank  
Zacks Industry Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Industry Rank



The Zacks Sector Rank assigns a rating to each of the 16 Sectors based on their average Zacks Rank.
A sector with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
Zacks Sector Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank 
The sector with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top sector (1 out of 16), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Sectors. The sector with the worst average Zacks Rank (16 out of 16) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank 
Zacks Sector Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank



The Zacks Equity Research reports, or ZER for short, are our in-house, independently produced research reports.
The ever popular one-page Snapshot reports are generated for virtually every single Zacks Ranked stock. It's packed with all of the company's key stats and salient decision making information. Including the Zacks Rank, Zacks Industry Rank, Style Scores, the Price, Consensus & Surprise chart, graphical estimate analysis and how a stocks stacks up to its peers.
The detailed multi-page Analyst report does an even deeper dive on the company's vital statistics. In addition to all of the proprietary analysis in the Snapshot, the report also visually displays the four components of the Zacks Rank (Agreement, Magnitude, Upside and Surprise); provides a comprehensive overview of the company business drivers, complete with earnings and sales charts; a recap of their last earnings report; and a bulleted list of reasons to buy or sell the stock. It also includes an industry comparison table to see how your stock compares to its expanded industry, and the S&P 500.
Researching stocks has never been so easy or insightful as with the ZER Analyst and Snapshot reports.
Learn more about Zacks Equity Research reports
See more Zacks Equity Research reports


Zacks Earnings ESP (Expected Surprise Prediction) looks to find companies that have recently seen positive earnings estimate revision activity. The idea is that more recent information is, generally speaking, more accurate and can be a better predictor of the future, which can give investors an advantage in earnings season.
The technique has proven to be very useful for finding positive surprises. In fact, when combining a Zacks Rank #3 or better and a positive Earnings ESP, stocks produced a positive surprise 70% of the time, while they also saw 28.3% annual returns on average, according to our 10 year backtest.
    
Visit the Earnings ESP Center
See the Full List of Stocks To Beat Earnings


This is our short term rating system that serves as a timeliness indicator for stocks over the next 1 to 3 months. How good is it? See rankings and related performance below. 



Zacks Rank
Definition
Annualized Return




1
Strong Buy
25.71%


2
Buy
18.12%


3
Hold
9.91%


4
Sell
5.49%


5
Strong Sell
2.29%


S&P
500
9.79%



Zacks Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Rank
Zacks Rank Home - All Zacks Rank resources in one place
Zacks Premium - The only way to fully access the Zacks Rank


The Zacks Industry Rank assigns a rating to each of the 265 X (Expanded) Industries based on their average Zacks Rank.
An industry with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
The industry with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top industry (1 out of 265), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Industries. The industry with the worst average Zacks Rank (265 out of 265) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank  
Zacks Industry Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Industry Rank



The Zacks Sector Rank assigns a rating to each of the 16 Sectors based on their average Zacks Rank.
A sector with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
Zacks Sector Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank 
The sector with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top sector (1 out of 16), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Sectors. The sector with the worst average Zacks Rank (16 out of 16) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank 
Zacks Sector Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank



The Style Scores are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style. 
The three scores are based on the trading styles of Growth, Value, and Momentum.


Growth Score
A


Value Score
A


Momentum Score
A


Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Style Scores  are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style.
The scores are based on the trading styles of Value, Growth, and Momentum. There's also a VGM Score ('V' for Value, 'G' for Growth and 'M' for Momentum), which combines the weighted average of the individual style scores into one score.



Value Score
A


Growth Score
A


Momentum Score
A


VGM Score
A



Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A, is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B in your personal trading style.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Zacks Equity Research reports, or ZER for short, are our in-house, independently produced research reports.
The ever popular one-page Snapshot reports are generated for virtually every single Zacks Ranked stock. It's packed with all of the company's key stats and salient decision making information. Including the Zacks Rank, Zacks Industry Rank, Style Scores, the Price, Consensus & Surprise chart, graphical estimate analysis and how a stocks stacks up to its peers.
The detailed multi-page Analyst report does an even deeper dive on the company's vital statistics. In addition to all of the proprietary analysis in the Snapshot, the report also visually displays the four components of the Zacks Rank (Agreement, Magnitude, Upside and Surprise); provides a comprehensive overview of the company business drivers, complete with earnings and sales charts; a recap of their last earnings report; and a bulleted list of reasons to buy or sell the stock. It also includes an industry comparison table to see how your stock compares to its expanded industry, and the S&P 500.
Researching stocks has never been so easy or insightful as with the ZER Analyst and Snapshot reports.
Learn more about Zacks Equity Research reports
See more Zacks Equity Research reports

(  = Change in last 30 days) 
View All Zacks Rank #1 Strong Buys





Premium Research: Industry Analysis



Top Peers
Symbol
Zacks Rank




Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A.
AAAP



Consort Medical PLC Sponsored ADR
CSRMY



Immune Design Corp.
IMDZ



Ionis Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
IONS



Ritter Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
RTTR



Summit Therapeutics PLC
SMMT



Aerie Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
AERI




See all Medical - Drugs Peers


 




Zacks News for AAAP

Galmed Pharmaceuticals (GLMD) Catches Eye: Stock Gains 15.7%
07/25/17-7:20AM EST  Zacks

Today's Strong Buys Breaking Out to New Highs
03/24/17-11:01PM EST  Zacks

AAAP: What are Zacks experts saying now?

Zacks Private Portfolio Services

Calithera Biosciences (CALA) Rises: Stock Moves Up 19.3%
03/14/17-7:30AM EST  Zacks

New Strong Buy Stocks for March 9th
03/09/17-12:00AM EST  Zacks

Acadia Healthcare (ACHC) Tops Q4 Earnings, Gives 2017 View
02/24/17-7:41AM EST  Zacks




Company Summary
Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. is a radiopharmaceutical company. The company, develops, produces and commercializes molecular nuclear medicine diagnostic and therapeutic products. Its products in clinical development include Lutathera, Somakit and Annexin V-128. The company's commercial products include Gluscan /Gluscan 500/Barnascan(R), IASOflu(R), IASOdopa(R), IASOcholine(R), MIBITEC/Adamibi and Leukokit(R). It operates primarily in France, Italy, the United Kingdom, Spain, Portugal, Israel, Switzerland, Germany and Canada.  Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. is headquartered in Saint Genis Pouilly, France.   





 




































Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. and China Biologic Products, Inc. Head to Head Compare



















            news.cmlviz.com
        


menu



share





        
            News Home     
        


   
             Apple 
        


   
             Facebook 
        


   
             Tesla 
        


   
             Amazon 
        


   
             Google 
        


   
             Archive 
        


        
            Our Authors 
        


   
             Contact
        













 












Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. (NASDAQ:AAAP) , China Biologic Products Inc (NASDAQ:CBPO) , AAAP,  CBPO, compare










Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. versus China Biologic Products Inc Head to Head Compare
				Date Published:
					
						2017-04-20
					
This is a head to head compare of Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. (NASDAQ:AAAP)  and China Biologic Products Inc (NASDAQ:CBPO) . We will compare the two companies on revenue growth, earnings, revenue per employee, operating margins, free cash flow and valuation. The head to head compare assigns 100 points in total. 
				


				Before we dive into the analysis, we will look at the stock returns for each company over the last three months, six months and the last year. The stock returns do not impact the head to head compare scores which are focused on the fundamentals of each company, but ultimately stock returns are are still a critical piece to a full analysis and compare.





Stock Returns



Symbol
3-Months
6-Months
One-Year
Fundamentals


AAAP
+30.2%
-3.3%
+5.9%



CBPO
+6.9%
-1.1%
-9.5%








 China Biologic Products Inc has a substantially higher fundamental rating then Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. which has an impact on the head-to-head comparison. The CML Star Rating is an objective, quantifiable measure of a company's operating and financial condition. 
		The rating is computed by measuring numerous elements of the company's current financial data and their associated changes over time.
		
		Now, let's dive into the two companies to compare them.






➤ Income Statement
First we turn to the income statement and compare revenue, earnings and revenue per employee for both companies. We note that simple revenue comparisons 
								do not impact the rating.
								
↪ China Biologic Products Inc has larger revenue in the last year than Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A.. 
						Raw revenue comps do not affect the head to head rating.Revenue↪ CBPO is showing a profit while AAAP has negative earnings over the last year.Net Income↪ AAAP generates notably larger revenue per employee ($243,000) than CBPO ($178,000).Revenue per Employee
			 ($ Millions)




➤ Margins
Next we create some derived metrics to compare the the amount of revenue earned per dollar of expense and the amount of free cash flow earned per dollar of revenue. Margins are one of the fairest ways to compare companies since they remove some of the bias of large versus small numbers.
								
↪ China Biologic Products Inc generates $1.85 in revenue for every $1 of expense, while Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. generates an operating loss with just $0.84 in revenue per $1 of expense.Revenue per Dollar of Expense↪ CBPO generates $0.04 in levered free cash flow for every $1 of revenue, 
					while AAAP generates a cash flow loss of $-0.04  per $1 of revenue.Free Cash Flow
		per Dollar of Revenue




➤ Growth
Finally we compare the financial metrics related to growth: revenue growth rates and price to sales.
								
↪ Both companies are growing revenue. Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. is growing revenue notably faster than China Biologic Products Inc.Revenue Growth↪  For every $1 in revenue, the stock market prices in $12.41 in market cap for AAAP and $8.89 in market cap for CBPO.Price to Sales



China Biologic Products Inc (NASDAQ:CBPO)  defeats Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. (NASDAQ:AAAP) : 79 to 21














x



Test your option strategies.
   Watch the video now.


 





Please read the legal disclaimers below.Legal The information contained on this site is provided for general informational purposes, as a convenience to the readers. The materials are not a substitute for obtaining professional advice from a qualified person, firm or corporation. Consult the appropriate professional advisor for more complete and current information. Capital Market Laboratories ("The Company") does not engage in rendering any legal or professional services by placing these general informational materials on this website.  The Company specifically disclaims any liability, whether based in contract, tort, strict liability or otherwise, for any direct, indirect, incidental, consequential, or special damages arising out of or in any way connected with access to or use of the site, even if we have been advised of the possibility of such damages, including liability in connection with mistakes or omissions in, or delays in transmission of, information to or from the user, interruptions in telecommunications connections to the site or viruses.  The Company make no representations or warranties about the accuracy or completeness of the information contained on this website. Any links provided to other server sites are offered as a matter of convenience and in no way are meant to imply that The Company endorses, sponsors, promotes or is affiliated with the owners of or participants in those sites, or endorse any information contained on those sites, unless expressly stated.  
























 




Advanced Accelerator Applications Signs Strategic Supply Agreement with University of Missouri for Lutetium 177 Nasdaq:AAAP









































































English
Français











Register
Sign In













Advanced Accelerator Applications Signs Strategic Supply Agreement with University of Missouri for Lutetium 177
Strengthens Global Supply Chain for Lead Investigational Product Lutetium Lu 177 Dotatate (Lutathera®) and Future Lu-177 Products 



















March 30, 2017 07:30 ET

 | Source: Advanced Accelerator Applications






SAINT-GENIS-POUILLY, France, March  30, 2017  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. (NASDAQ:AAAP) (AAA or the Company), an international specialist in Molecular Nuclear Medicine (MNM), today announced a 10-year exclusive supply agreement for lutetium 177 with the University of Missouri Research Reactor (MURR®). Through this agreement, MURR® will supply AAA with GMP-quality lutetium 177 Chloride, the precursor for production of investigational product lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera®) and other Lu 177-based therapeutics in development. Lutetium 177 is a radionuclide that emits both high-energy beta and low-energy gamma radiation. Beta particles (electrons) are commonly used as an external radiation source to treat solid tumors, known as radiotherapy. However, in nuclear medicine, tumor killing beta particles are delivered to tumors intravenously, by labeling a targeting molecule (such as dotatate), with a radionuclide (such as lutetium 177), as in lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera®). The targeting molecule has an affinity for certain tumor receptors, creating a rapid uptake of these molecules by the tumor cells. The beta emitting radiation of the radionuclide is treating the tumor; while the gamma emitting radiation may be visualized using specialized imaging techniques, enabling quantification of treatment delivery to tumor cells. Ralph Butler, Executive Director of MURR® commented, “MURR® has a proud history of providing research isotopes to industry. Since the early days of targeted Lu 177 research at MURR®, our vision has been to reliably supply Lu 177 Chloride for research and ultimately produce directly for drug manufacturers. This agreement completes our vision, as we believe AAA’s breakthrough investigational product, Lutathera®, is on the verge of approval in the USA and Europe and will be widely administered to patients. The agreement also allows MURR® to continue its worldwide research collaborations using this uniquely capable isotope.” Stefano Buono, Chief Executive Officer of AAA stated, “This agreement complements our existing supply of Lutetium 177 from our IDB subsidiary in the Netherlands, and supports our plans to produce lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera®) for the North American market at our Millburn, NJ site. Lutetium 177’s utility in oncology therapy has been long documented and having two reliable sources uniquely positions us to expand our pipeline of lutetium 177-based therapeutics for oncology indications, and serve as a global supplier to other end users.” About lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera®) Lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera®) is an investigational, Lu-177-labeled somatostatin analog peptide currently in development for the treatment of gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs), including foregut, midgut, and hindgut neuroendocrine tumors in adults. Lutetium Lu 177 dotatate belongs to an emerging form of treatments called Peptide Receptor Radionuclide Therapy (PRRT), which involves targeting neuroendocrine tumors with radiolabeled somatostatin analog peptides. This novel, investigational compound has received orphan drug designation from the European Medicines Agency (EMA) and the US Food and Drug Administration (FDA). Currently, lutetium Lu 177 dotatate is administered on a compassionate use and named patient basis for the treatment of NETs and other tumors over-expressing somatostatin receptors in ten European countries and in the US under an Expanded Access Program (EAP) for midgut NETs. New Drug Application and Marketing Authorization Application submissions to the FDA and EMA for lutetium Lu 177 dotatate are currently under review.   About Advanced Accelerator Applications Advanced Accelerator Applications is an innovative radiopharmaceutical company that develops, produces and commercializes Molecular Nuclear Medicine products. AAA’s lead investigational therapeutic candidate, lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera®), is a novel MNM compound that AAA is currently developing for the treatment of Neuroendocrine Tumors, a significant unmet medical need. Founded in 2002, AAA has its headquarters in Saint-Genis-Pouilly, France. AAA currently has 22 production and R&D facilities able to manufacture both diagnostics and therapeutic MNM products, and has more than 500 employees in 13 countries (France, Italy, UK, Germany, Switzerland, Spain, Poland, Portugal, The Netherlands, Belgium, Israel, the U.S. and Canada). AAA reported sales of €109.3 million in 2016 (+23% vs. 2015). AAA is listed on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the ticker “AAAP”. For more information, please visit: www.adacap.com. Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Statements  This press release may contain forward-looking statements. All statements, other than statements of historical facts, contained in this press release, including statements regarding the Company's strategy, future operations, future financial position, future revenues, projected costs, prospects, plans and objectives of management, are forward-looking statements. The words "anticipate," "believe," "estimate," "expect," "intend," "may," "plan," "predict," "project," "target," "potential," "will," "would," "could," "should," "continue," and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements, although not all forward-looking statements contain these identifying words. Forward-looking statements reflect the Company's current expectation regarding future events. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results, events or developments to be materially different from any future results, events or developments expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. Such factors include, but are not limited to, changing market conditions, the successful and timely completion of clinical studies, the timing of our submission of applications for regulatory approvals, EMA, FDA and other regulatory approvals for our product candidates, the occurrence of side effects or serious adverse events caused by or associated with our products and product candidates; our ability to procure adequate quantities of necessary supplies and raw materials for lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera®) and other chemical compounds acceptable for use in our manufacturing processes from our suppliers; our ability to organize timely and safe delivery of our products or product candidates by third parties; any problems with the manufacture, quality or performance of our products or product candidates; the rate and degree of market acceptance and the clinical utility of lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera®) and our other products or product candidates; our estimates regarding the market opportunity for lutetium Lu 177 dotatate (Lutathera®), our other product candidates and our existing products; our anticipation that we will generate higher sales as we diversify our products; our ability to implement our growth strategy including expansion in the U.S.; our ability to sustain and create additional sales, marketing and distribution capabilities; our intellectual property and licensing position; legislation or regulation in countries where we sell our products that affect product pricing, taxation, reimbursement, access or distribution channels; regulatory actions or litigation; and general economic, political, demographic and business conditions in Europe, the U.S. and elsewhere. Except as required by applicable securities laws, we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.Contacts:

AAA Corporate Communications
Rachel Levine
Director of Communications
rachel.levine@adacap.com
Tel: + 1-212-235-2395

AAA Investor Relations
Jordan Silverstein
Director of Investor Relations
jordan.silverstein@adacap.com
Tel: + 1-212-235-2394

Media inquiries:

Makovsky & Company
Lee Davies
ldavies@makovsky.com
Tel: +212-508-9651


Related Articles
other press releases by Advanced Accelerator Applications


Advanced Accelerator Applications Announces Positive CHMP Opinion Recommending Approval of Lutetium 177Lu Oxodotreotide (Lutathera®) for Gastroenteropancreatic Neuroendocrine (GEP-NET) Tumors
July 21, 2017 08:29


Advanced Accelerator Applications Reports 21% Sales Growth for First Quarter 2017
May 31, 2017 07:00


Advanced Accelerator Applications and Blue Earth Diagnostics Announce European Manufacturing and Distribution Agreements for Axumin™ (Fluciclovine (18F)) for PET Imaging of Recurrent Prostate Cancer
May 30, 2017 08:36


Advanced Accelerator Applications Appoints Christine Mikail to Board of Directors
May 25, 2017 07:00


Advanced Accelerator Applications Receives 2017 Industry Innovation Award from National Organization for Rare Disorders for NETSPOT®, a Diagnostic Drug for Neuroendocrine Tumors
May 18, 2017 07:00






290



other news releases in

Health

in the last 30 days
                            











Profile

Advanced Accelerator Applications





  Subscribe via RSS
 Subscribe via ATOM
 Javascript



  SAINT GENIS POUILLY,  FRANCE




Contact Data
Contacts:

AAA Corporate Communications
Rachel Levine
Director of Communications
rachel.levine@adacap.com
Tel: + 1-212-235-2395

AAA Investor Relations
Jordan Silverstein
Director of Investor Relations
jordan.silverstein@adacap.com
Tel: + 1-212-235-2394

Media inquiries:

Makovsky & Company
Lee Davies
ldavies@makovsky.com
Tel: +212-508-9651

Contact



With a Reader Account, it's easy to send email directly to the contact for this release. Sign up today for your free Reader Account!



Already have an account?  Log in here.











Media Files



Advanced Accelerator Applications  Logo






LOGO URL | Copy the link below
            





Formats available:






                            Original
                        




                            Medium
                        




                            Small
                        



















Newswire Distribution Network & Management



Home
Newsroom
RSS Feeds
Legal
Contact Us






About Us
GlobeNewswire, a Nasdaq company, is one of the world's largest newswire distribution networks, specializing in the delivery of corporate press releases financial disclosures and multimedia content to the media, investment community, individual investors and the general public.
            




Contact Us


Corporate Headquarters
2321 Rosecrans Avenue.
Suite 2200
El Segundo, CA 90245
Phone: (800) 307-6627
Fax:  (800) 307-3567
            


European Headquarters
Woolgate Exchange,
25 Basinghall Street,
London EC2V 5HA
UK
Phone: +1 866-465-8454




© 2017 GlobeNewswire, Inc. All Rights Reserved.























IPO Report: Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. (AAAP) | Equities.com

























































BREAKING NEWS


Previous


Next






                  How to Invoice When Doing a Large Freelance Project                





                  Genocea Biosciences (GNCA): Positive Top Line Data for Genital Herpes Drug                





                  ​Civeo: Turnaround in Housing Niche                





                  When Social Media Bites Back                





                  HOLLY: “Looking For Bounce” Leads 13 Other Trade Ideas                











US/Global
Canada
















News




Log in






Login to your account










Log in




  			Remember Me  		

Forgot your password?

Forgot your username?

























Register



















































			News		


		IPO Report: Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. (AAAP)	

Francis Gaskins


						Follow					
											|
				Wednesday, 04 February 2015 16:04 (EST)









Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. (AAAP) is an innovative radiopharmaceutical company that develops, produces and commercializes MNM diagnostic and therapeutic products. It is based in Saint Genis Pouilly, France.

	Ten other companies are scheduled for the week of Feb. 2, 2015. The full IPO calendar is available at IPOpremium.

	Manager, Joint-managers: Citigroup, Jefferies
	Co-managers: Canaccord Genuity, JMP Securities

AAAP scheduled a $75 million IPO with a market capitalization of $518 million at a price range midpoint of $14 for Thursday, Feb. 5, 2015 on Nasdaq. SEC Documents

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Overview

	AAAP is an innovative radiopharmaceutical company that develops, produces and commercializes MNM diagnostic and therapeutic products.

	MNM is a medical specialty that uses trace amounts of radioactive compounds to create functional images of organs and lesions and to treat diseases such as cancer.

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Valuation

Glossary





					Accumulated deficit  (mm) 



					.



					.



					-$34


				 

				 

				 




					Per share dilution



					.



					.



					-$8.56


				 

				 

				 




					-----------------------------------------------------------------------


				 

				 

				 




Valuation Ratios



Mrkt Cap  (mm) 



Price /Sls



Price /Erngs



Price /BkVlue



Price /TanBV



% offered in IPO





					annualizing Sept 9 mos


				 

				 

				 

				 

				 




					Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. (AAAP)



					$518



					6.6



					-134.0



					2.7



					3.6



					15%




				 

				 

				 

				 

				 

				 

				 



				 

				 

				 

				 

				 

				 

				 



				 

				 

				 

				 

				 

				 

				 



				 

				 

				 

				 

				 

				 

				 




Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Conclusion

	Neutral

	Molecular nuclear medicine (MNM) diagnostic & therapeutic products.

	MNM market exceeds $4.1bb

	29% top line rev growth to $59mm for Sept 9 mos


	Therapeutic candidate is in a pivotal Phase 3 trial

	Price-to-bk of 2.7

	P/E ratio of -134 indicating low cash burn relative to market cap

	Net loss -5% of rev

	Shareholder may purchase $10mm on the IPO

	TIP-Pre IPO S.p.A may purchase $5mm of registered shares

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Business

	AAAP is an innovative radiopharmaceutical company that develops, produces and commercializes MNM (molecular nuclear medicine) diagnostic and therapeutic products.

MNM is a medical specialty that uses trace amounts of radioactive compounds to create functional images of organs and lesions and to treat diseases such as cancer.

	AAAP  has built a leadership position in MNM in Europe by manufacturing and commercializing its broad portfolio of six diagnostic products for a number of clinical indications, and by selectively acquiring and integrating complementary businesses and assets.

	AAAP leverages its leadership position, industry experience and know-how to pursue targeted R&D strategies.

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Sales from Six Diagnostic PET and SPECT Products

	The foundation of AAAP’s growth has been its portfolio of six diagnostic PET and SPECT products.

	PET and SPECT are imaging techniques in MND with applications in clinical oncology, cardiology, neurology and inflammatory/infectious diseases. 

 

	PET and SPECT are imaging techniques in molecular nuclear diagnostics, or MND, with applications in clinical oncology, cardiology, neurology and inflammatory/infectious diseases.

	The leading diagnostic product is Gluscan, a branded 18-fluorodeoxyglucose, or FDG, PET imaging agent.

	Gluscan assists in the diagnosis of serious medical conditions, primarily in oncology, by assessing glucose metabolism.

	AAAP is building on its diagnostics foundation by developing additional MND product candidates to further strengthen its existing portfolio.

	AAAP is in preclinical development for Somakit, Lutathera’s companion PET diagnostic candidate, and has initiated Phase 1/2 clinical trials for rhAnnexin V-128, or Annexin V-128, a SPECT product candidate for the imaging of apoptotic and necrotic lesions with applications in a broad range of indications such as rheumatoid arthritis.

	AAAP’s total sales have grown from €40.8 million (US$51.5 million) for the year ended December 31, 2012 to €53.8 million (US$67.9 million) for the year ended December 31, 2013 and from €38.9 million (US$49.1 million) for the nine months ended September 30, 2013 to €50.2 million (US$63.3 million) for the nine months ended September 30, 2014.

MNM (molecular nuclear medicine) Market

	The global MNM market is estimated at approximately US$4.1 billion as of December 31, 2013 (with 96% of sales in MND and 4% of sales in MNT) according to MEDraysintell.

	While the market is largely concentrated in MND, where AAAP has a leading position in Europe, MNT represents a fast-growing field in MNM.

	MEDraysintell projects that MNT (molecular nuclear therapy) sales may constitute up to US$13.0 billion of total MNM sales of US$24.0 billion by 2030, representing an annual growth rate of 30%.

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Diagnostic Products

	AAAP’s leading diagnostic product is Gluscan, its branded FDG PET imaging agent.

	Gluscan assists in the diagnosis of serious medical conditions, primarily in oncology, by assessing glucose metabolism.

	AAAP is building on its diagnostics foundation by developing additional MND product candidates to further strengthen its existing portfolio.

	AAAP is in preclinical development for Somakit, Lutathera’s companion PET diagnostic candidate, and have initiated Phase 1/2 clinical trials for Annexin V-128, a SPECT product candidate for the imaging of apoptotic and necrotic lesions with applications in a broad range of indications such as rheumatoid arthritis.

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Lead Therapeutic Candidate

	AAAP’s lead therapeutic candidate, Lutathera, is a novel compound that AAAP is currently developing for the treatment of midgut NETs, a significant unmet medical need.

	Lutathera is a Lu-177-labeled somatostatin analogue peptide that has received orphan drug designation from the EMA and the FDA and is currently administered on a compassionate use and named patient basis for the treatment of NETs in nine European countries.

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Lutathera in a Pivotal Phase 3 Trial

	AAAP has identified that Lutathera has been used in over 2,900 patients and is currently in a pivotal Phase 3 trial for the treatment of progressive inoperable midgut NETs.

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Intellectual Property

	With respect to its products Gluscan, IASOflu, IASOdopa and IASOcholine, AAAP relies on a combination of marketing authorization and owned and licensed know-how, technology and trademarks to maintain its competitive advantage.

	AAAP holds a trademark registration for GLUSCAN in France and as an international registration under the Madrid system.

	AAAP also licenses trademark registrations for IASOFLU, IASODOPA and IASOCHOLINE in Austria, Germany, France, Hungary, Italy and the Czech Republic.

	These products are not currently covered by any issued patents or pending patent applications in any jurisdictions.

	As of October 1, 2014, AAAP owned or exclusively licensed a total of 55 issued patents and 18 patent applications covering certain aspects of Lutathera, Annexin V-128 and Somakit in various jurisdictions throughout the world, including original filings, continuations and divisional applications.

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Competition

PET
Because PET products have a short shelf life of approximately ten hours, AAAP’s competition is limited to companies and organizations with manufacturing infrastructure located within a distance that allows for rapid delivery to nuclear medicine facilities.

	AAAP faces competition in the field of PET from other manufacturers of PET products, principally IBA Molecular, which specializes in radiation therapy and diagnostics and operates throughout the world with over 50 locations in the United States, Europe and Asia.

	AAAP also faces competition from larger healthcare companies, such as GE Healthcare, which have varying degrees of investment in PET but whose products and sales comprise a significant proportion of the MNM market.

	In addition, AAAP faces competition from local companies and university hospitals that operate within specific geographic areas.

	While these competitors may have more limited manufacturing infrastructure than AAAP does, they may have greater experience or a more established reputation in these areas than AAAP does.

SPECT

	AAAP faces competition in the field of SPECT from a greater number of SPECT manufacturers than AAAP does in PET, given the more established and widespread use of SPECT imaging.

	AAAP’s competitors include both large healthcare companies such as GE Healthcare and IBA Molecular, and smaller diagnostic imaging companies.

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Therapeutics

	AAAP’s lead therapeutic candidate, Lutathera, is the first ever radiopharmaceutical product candidate to enter European and U.S. Phase 3 clinical trials for the treatment of progressive midgut NETs.

	However, Lutathera faces competition from existing cancer treatments, including standard chemotherapy treatments that are not approved for the midgut NET indication.

	Competing drugs that target the same or similar NETs targeted by Lutathera (though they are not approved for the same indication as Lutathera) include Sandostatin® and Afinitor®, both from Novartis, Somatuline® from Ipsen and Sutent® from Pfizer.

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. 5% Shareholders Pre-IPO

	Stefano Buono  8.0%

	Andrea Ruben Osvaldo Levi       7.9%                 ​

	Carpéfin S.r.l.    5.6%     ​            ​

	HBM Healthcare Investments (Cayman) Ltd. ​       7.9%     ​            ​

	Life Sciences Capital S.p.A.      6.8%                 ​

	Sergio Dompé S.r.l.      8.9%                

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Dividends

	No dividends are planned.

Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. Use of Proceeds

	AAAP expects to receive $63 million from its IPO and use it for the following:

	US$15.0 million for clinical trials and other R&D efforts for its principal pipeline product candidates, Lutathera, Annexin V-128, and Somakit, as follows, with any additional funding for the completion of such trials to be obtained from cash on hand:

	​US$10.0 million for a contemplated Phase 3 trial for Lutathera for treatment of pNETs, which potentially could begin by the end of 2015;

	​US$4.0 million for the Phase 1/2 trials for Annexin V-128 to evaluate its safety, pharmacokinetics and dosimetry in patients with rheumatoid arthritis or ankylosing spondylitis; and

	​US$1.0 million for Somakit’s development for the diagnosis and management of somatostatin-receptor-positive NETs;

	​US$38.4 million for expanding its manufacturing infrastructure and commercialization capabilities and organizing distribution to additional markets and geographies, including:

	​US$33.9 million for investing in expanding its commercialization infrastructure for Lutathera, including additional personnel;

	​US$4.0 million for the construction or acquisition of a U.S. site dedicated to the production of Lutathera with an estimated initial capital investment of  €7.5 million (US$9.5 million); and

	​US$0.5 million for modifications to its F-18 production site in Zaragoza, Spain, in order to enable it to produce Lutathera in addition to F-18 products; and

	​the remainder for general corporate purposes, including R&D efforts for its other product candidates and acquisitions of, or investment in, businesses or assets to expand any of the above. 
DISCLOSURE:
					The views and opinions expressed in this article are those of the authors, and do not represent the views of equities.com. Readers should not consider statements made by the author as formal recommendations and should consult their financial advisor before making any investment decisions. To read our full disclosure, please go to: http://www.equities.com/disclaimer



Comments






You have to be logged in to leave a comment.
Take me to log in
Don't have an account?









×
You must log in first


I'm sorry, but in order to complete what you're trying to do, you must be logged in.


Take me to log in
Don't have an account?
I'm good for now







 
More on Equities.com



Oyster Completes CAD$1.3 Million Private Placement


Fiji Airways Economy Guests Now Get to Bid for Business Upgrades with Bula Bid


Acquisition Takes Conway Analytics To Next Level In Tracking Global Investment Data














Trending Articles



​Aftermaster (AFTM) Announces Three Consecutive Quarters of Strong Sales




​NXT-ID’s Fit Pay Adding Secure Shine to New Token Smart Rings




​California Green Tree Gives Investors Early Shot at Promising Cannabis Grower




​MGX Minerals (XMG:CNX) Flexes Its Diverse Portfolio




​Is Madison the Next Great Copper-Gold Project in Famous Montana District?




Quantum Leap




​SinglePoint (SING) is Using Blockchain and Cryptocurrency Technologies to Transform Broken Markets




WorldVentures Showcases the Flye Smart Card by NXT-ID (NXTD) at BootCamp Miami




Genocea Biosciences (GNCA): Positive Top Line Data for Genital Herpes Drug




​THC Therapeutics (THCT): Unlocking the Health and Wellness Potential of Cannabis




​Jeff Kagan: IBM Moving Further, Faster into AI




​Retail Tremors Shake the Payment Ecosystem 




​The Future of Alcohol is Hangover-Free: Here’s How This Company Does It




Banking the Unbanked is a $380 Billion Opportunity




​Radient's Technology is the Next Step in Turning Cannabinoids into Pharmaceuticals




​SEC Investigates Registration Violations in EB-5 Offerings




When Social Media Bites Back





Emerging Growth


Cavitation Techs Inc


                Cavitation Technologies Inc engineers and designs Nano technology based systems that have potential applications in industrial liquid processing.            










Private Markets 


8tracks


                Our mission is to be the best place for people who care about music to 
create and discover thoughtfully curated playlists. In essence, 8tracks 
is a platform for online mixtapes.            



Cross Campus


                With over 500 members and operating 80,000 square feet by summer 2016, 
Cross Campus is one of the country’s top ten shared, collaborative 
office or "coworking" operators in the US.…            










Corporate SitePremium ProductsAdvertisingRSS Feeds




AboutContactSite MapTestimonials




Privacy PolicyTerms and ConditionsDisclaimerConference











© 2017 Equities
* All dates and time are being displayed in Eastern Standard Time (EST).






 

















































	Advanced Accelerator Applications Fully Acquires Atreus Pharmaceuticals Inc Enrolls First Patient In A Phase 1 2 Clinical Trial For Its Key Diagnostic













































Employer:
Login
Post Jobs


Job Seeker:
Login
Sign Up

























Search Life Sciences Jobs





Search Job Title Only












Radius:
Miles



Km80.5
















                 News | News By Subject | News by Disease |  
    News By Date | Search News



















Get Our FREEIndustry eNewsletter

email:


*
            
*
            



















 

 






Advanced Accelerator Applications  Fully Acquires Atreus Pharmaceuticals, Inc.; Enrolls First Patient In A Phase 1/2 Clinical Trial For Its Key Diagnostic Candidate Annexin V-128 In Rheumatoid Arthritis And Ankylosing Spondylitis  











Tweet








1/8/2015 10:40:26 AM


08 January 2015, Saint-Genis-Pouilly, France – Advanced Accelerator Applications S.A. (“AAA” or “the Company”), an international specialist in Molecular Nuclear Medicine (MNM), announced today that it has acquired the remaining 49.9% of Atreus Pharmaceuticals Corporation, a development-stage biopharmaceutical company headquartered in Ottawa, Canada and focused on the development of proprietary molecular imaging products aimed at imaging apoptosis and necrosis based on Annexin V. Atreus Pharmaceuticals Corporation is now a fully owned AAA subsidiary and has been renamed AAA Canada.
AAA also announces the enrollment of the first patient in the Phase I/IIa clinical trial to evaluate the safety, pharmacokinetics and dosing of key diagnostic product candidate 99mTc-rhAnnexin V-128 in patients with rheumatoid arthritis or ankylosing spondylitis. The study will also assess the ability of 99mTc-rhAnnexin V-128 to identify the disease and to monitor the effectiveness of current drug treatment. 99mTc-rhAnnexin V-128 is a single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) radiopharmaceutical agent being developed to detect early cell stress and apoptosis (programmed cell death) in a number of pathological conditions including rheumatoid arthritis and ankylosing spondylitis.
In this Phase I/IIa clinical trial 20 patients will be enrolled to receive two doses of 99mTc-rhAnnexin V-128, one at baseline and one after drug treatment. The principal investigator of the study is Prof. John Prior, University Hospital of Lausanne, Switzerland.
A Phase I trial has been completed at the University of Ottawa Heart Institute in Canada to assess the safety, pharmacokinetics and dosing of 99mTc-rhAnnexin V-128 in 12 healthy volunteers. The results are currently being analysed. The principal investigator of this study is Dr Terrence Ruddy.
Stefano Buono, Chief Executive Officer of AAA, commented: "These two announcements are key milestones in AAA’s progress. The acquisition of the remaining 49.9% of Atreus has been triggered by a number of successful milestones achieved during the development of Annexin V-128. I am delighted that Atreus’ founder, Bill Dickie, will now be President and CEO of AAA Canada and will continue working with us in what we expect will be the development of products based on Annexin V. We are also very excited to be initiating the first of a series of new Phase I/II clinical trials aimed at understanding the potential of 99mTc-rhAnnexin V-128 in different indications.”
Bill Dickie, President and Chief Executive Officer of AAA Canada, added: “99mTc-rhAnnexin V-128 potentially has multiple applications in cardiology, oncology and autoimmune disorders as it detects the fundamental process of apoptosis. Many diseases are increasingly treated with powerful and expensive biologic drugs. An imaging biomarker of apoptosis has the potential to be an important personalized disease management tool."
Prof. John Prior said: “Early diagnosis and effective treatment management is crucial for the treatment of diseases such as rheumatoid arthritis and ankylosing spondylitis, and can lead to a significantly improved quality of life for patients suffering from these progressive, debilitating diseases.”
Dr Terrence Ruddy added: “99mTc-rhAnnexin V-128 imaging has many exciting potential applications. The single vial 99mTc-rhAnnexin V-128 kit being developed by AAA is convenient to use and has the potential to become a cost effective tool in the diagnosis and management of a wide range of diseases.”
AAA has an exclusive, worldwide license to develop proprietary molecular imaging products based on Annexin V-128.
About 99mTc-rhAnnexin V-128 and SPECT
99mTc-rhAnnexin V-128 is a single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) radiopharmaceutical agent in development that aims to detect early cell stress and apoptosis in vivo to assess programmed cell death in a number of pathological conditions, including rheumatoid arthritis, ankylosing spondylitis and cardiovascular diseases.
The product, based on a specifically designed recombinant form of Annexin V-128, is being developed as a single lyophilized vial 99mTc-rhAnnexin V-128 kit by AAA.
Wild-type Annexin, labeled with Technetium-99m (Tc-99m), a medical isotope widely used in diagnostic imaging, has been studied extensively. In previous trials, Tc-99m labelled Annexin has demonstrated the ability to image cellular apoptosis and necrosis – conditions associated with a variety of debilitating or fatal medical disorders including rheumatoid arthritis, Crohn’s disease, Alzheimer’s disease, myocarditis, cardiac transplant rejection, acute myocardial infarction and unstable atherosclerotic carotid artery disease. In addition, Tc-99m labelled Annexin has been used to evaluate the response to treatment for lymphoma and lung cancer.
SPECT is a molecular nuclear diagnostic imaging technique in which a radioisotope such as Technetium-99m is injected into a patient through the bloodstream and reaches the lesion where it emits gamma rays that are detected by SPECT cameras. SPECT is used to diagnose a wide range of conditions within oncology, cardiovascular diseases, neurological disorders and other diseases in their early stages.
About Rheumatoid Arthritis and Ankylosing Spondylitis
Both rheumatoid arthritis (RA) and ankylosing spondylitis (AS) are autoimmune diseases. RA is estimated to affect up to 70 million people worldwide. RA causes joints to become chronically inflamed, painful and swollen, and patients can become increasingly disabled as cartilage and bone are damaged. AS is estimated to affect up to 33 million people worldwide. It is often called arthritis of the spine and is a painful and progressive form of spinal arthritis that usually affects people under the age of 35 years. AS typically begins in the late teens and early twenties and can result in fusing of the spinal vertebrae, hips and other joints. Often misdiagnosed as "just back pain”, or undifferentiated arthritis, AS can affect vision and internal organs. Both RA and AS patients are often treated with a number of medicines, combining protein-based biologic therapies with methotrexate, the most common disease-modifying antirheumatic drug.
About Advanced Accelerator Applications
Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is a radiopharmaceutical company founded in 2002 to develop innovative diagnostic and therapeutic products. AAA’s main focus is in the field of Molecular Imaging and targeted, individualized therapy for the management of patients with serious conditions (“Personalized Medicine”). AAA currently has 17 production and R&D facilities able to manufacture both diagnostics and therapeutic MNM products, and has over 330 employees in 11 countries (France, Italy, UK, Germany, Switzerland, Spain, Poland, Portugal, Israel, U.S. and Canada). In 2013 AAA reported sales of €53.8 million (+31.77% vs. 2012). For more information please visit: www.adacap.com
Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This press release may contain forward-looking statements. All statements, other than statements of historical facts, contained in this press release, including statements regarding the Company's strategy, future operations, future financial position, future revenues, projected costs, prospects, plans and objectives of management, are forward-looking statements. The words "anticipate," "believe," "estimate," "expect," "intend," "may," "plan," "predict," "project," "target," "potential," "will," "would," "could," "should," "continue," and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements, although not all forward-looking statements contain these identifying words. Forward-looking statements reflect the Company's current expectation regarding future events. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results, events or developments to be materially different from any future results, events or developments expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. Such factors include, but are not limited to, changing market conditions, the successful and timely completion of clinical studies, EMA, U.S. FDA and other regulatory approvals for our product candidates, the establishment of corporate alliances, the impact of competitive products and pricing, new product development, and uncertainties related to the regulatory approval process or the ability to obtain drug product in sufficient quantity or at standards acceptable to health regulatory authorities to complete clinical trials or to meet commercial demand. Except as required by applicable securities laws, we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Contacts
Laetitia Defaye  
Head of Corporate Communications
laetitia.defaye@adacap.com 
Tel: +33 (0)6 86 65 73 52 

Véronique Mermet

 Communications Officer 
 info@adacap.com
Tel: +33 (0)4 50 99 30 70

Media enquiries
FTI Consulting (UK) 
Julia Phillips
 Julia.Phillips@fticonsulting.com 
Tel: +44 (0)203 727 1000 
 Natalie Garland-Collins

Natalie.Garland-Collins@fticonsulting.com 
Tel: +44 (0)203 727 1000

iCorporate (Italy)
 Elisa Piacentino 
elisa.piacentino@icorporate.it 
Tel: +39 02 4678754 - +39 366 9134595 

Federica Casilli
federica.casilli@icorporate.com
Tel: +39 02 4678756

JV Public Relations NY (US)
Janet Vasquez
jvasquez@jvprny.com Tel: + 1-212- 645-5498 - +1-917- 569-7470Help employers find you! Check out all the jobs and post your resume. 






                Read at
                BioSpace.com







Related News
Nuclear Therapy Biotech Advanced Accelerator Applications  Files For A $100 Million IPO  Adaptive Biotechnologies Banks $94 Million, Buys Bay Area's Sequenta, Inc. Advanced Accelerator Applications  Acquires GE Healthcare’s FDG-PET Radiopharmaceutical Business In Italy  Pfizer (PFE) Takes Controlling Interest In Startup; Grabs Access of Preclinical CMV Candidate  Advanced Accelerator Applications  Reports Full-Year 2013 Financial Results: Company Reports Over 30% Growth In Sales  Gilead Sciences, Inc. (GILD) Snaps Up Liver Disease Treatment from Phenex Pharmaceuticals AG in $470 Million Deal  Advanced Proteome Therapeutics Corporation with Atreus Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Advance Annexin V Conjugates for Diagnostic Imaging and Research Use  Arrowhead Research Corporation (ARWR) Soars on Rumor of Gilead Sciences, Inc. (GILD)'s Interest  Advanced Proteome Therapeutics Corporation and Atreus Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Announce Strategic R&D Agreement  Merck & Co. (MRK) Snaps Up Swiss Biotech In $375 Buyout Deal  




Please enable JavaScript to view the comments powered by Disqus.
comments powered by Disqus






















                            •
                            BioSpace.com










                            •
                            Atreus Pharmaceuticals, Inc.



                            •
                            Advanced Accelerator Applications 




             
        





                            •
                            Biotech/Pharma - Mergers and Acquisitions



                            •
                            Biotech/Pharma - Mergers and Acquisitions (World)




             
        















                              
                            

                              
                             
                              
                            

                              
                            








                 
































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Jobs at Advanced Accelerator Applications USA, Inc. | Indeed.com








Find JobsCompany ReviewsFind SalariesFind ResumesEmployers / Post Job








Upload your resume


Sign in









Find CompaniesAdvanced Accelerator Applications USA, Inc.AboutReviewsSalariesPhotos19JobsQ&AAdvanced Accelerator Applications USA, Inc. JobsFind jobs at Advanced Accelerator Applications USA, Inc.:job title, keywordsWhere:city, state, or zip  19 jobs at Advanced Accelerator Applications USA, Inc.NET Oncology Account ManagerSeattle, WAAdvanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an innovative International pharmaceutical company and a leader in molecular nuclear medicine. We have an...Easily Apply13 days agoNET Oncology Account ManagerPortland, ORAdvanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an innovative International pharmaceutical company and a leader in molecular nuclear medicine. We have an...Easily Apply13 days agoUS Pharmacy Operations Manager, Ga68 productsMillburn, NJAdvanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an International pharmaceutical company and a leader in molecular nuclear medicine. We have an established pipeline...Easily Apply13 days agoCustomer Service Manager / Order Processing ManagerMillburn, NJAdvanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an innovative International pharmaceutical company and a leader in molecular nuclear medicine. We have an...Easily Apply13 days agoMedical Science Liaison (MSL) (Oncology)Houston, TXAdvanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an innovative radiopharmaceutical company that develops, produces and commercializes Molecular Nuclear Medicine (MNM...Easily Apply14 days agoNET Oncology Account ManagerAtlanta, GAob Description Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an innovative International pharmaceutical company and a leader in molecular nuclear medicine. We...Easily Apply14 days agoClinical Research Associate (CRA with Oncology Experience)Millburn, NJAdvanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an International pharmaceutical company and a leader in molecular nuclear medicine. We have an established pipeline...Easily Apply14 days agoMedical Science Liaison (MSL) (Oncology)St. Louis, MOAdvanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an innovative radiopharmaceutical company that develops, produces and commercializes Molecular Nuclear Medicine (MNM...Easily Apply14 days agoRegulatory Affairs ManagerNew York, NYAdvanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an International pharmaceutical company and a leader in molecular nuclear medicine. We have an established pipeline...Easily Apply14 days agoRegulatory Affairs ManagerMillburn, NJAdvanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an International pharmaceutical company and a leader in molecular nuclear medicine. We have an established pipeline...Easily Apply14 days agoRegional Market Access ManagerChicago, ILAdvanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an innovative International pharmaceutical company and a leader in molecular nuclear medicine. We have an...Easily Apply30+ days agoNET Oncology Account ManagerColumbus, OHAdvanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) is an innovative International pharmaceutical company and a leader in molecular nuclear medicine. We have an...Easily Apply30+ days ago12Next »Claimed ProfileWant to know more about working here?Ask a question about working or interviewing at Advanced Accelerator Applications USA, Inc.. Our community is ready to answer.Ask a Question





Jobs - Browse Companies - Salaries - 









Job Category Trends - Forums - 
Browse Jobs - Tools - API - About - Help Center


©2017 Indeed - Cookies, Privacy and Terms


















        Create an account | Indeed Accounts


















Mobile Job Search | Indeed.com | Indeed.com










Find JobsCompany ReviewsFind SalariesFind ResumesEmployers / Post Job






Sign in






























Job search anywhere, anytime.
Find the job that's right for you on the world's #1 job site


For Android



For iPhone, iPod and iPad



















Fast, simple job search


Save jobs to your account



Easily apply from your phone with your Indeed Resume



Discover great companies to work for







© 2017 Indeed






















Post a Job | Indeed.com









Find JobsCompany ReviewsFind SalariesFind ResumesEmployers / Post Job






Sign in






















Indeed for employers
Contact Sales
Post a Job


















Your next hire is here.
Indeed helps millions of job seekers and employers find the right fit every day. Start hiring now on the world's #1 job site.
Post Job
Hiring software engineers? Try Indeed Prime








The right fit for your jobs
200 million people visit Indeed every month, giving you access to the most talent in every field.





On desktop and mobile
Over 60% of job searches are mobile. Post jobs on Indeed to accept applications from any mobile device.





More quality hires
Indeed is the #1 external source of hire and provides 5X more hires than any other job site. Source: SilkRoad







How Indeed helps you hire




Reach the most job seekers today
Post your jobs online to attract talent from mobile and desktop devices.
Create an account and enter your job description. Review applications, manage candidates and schedule interviews from your Indeed account. Learn more about posting a job on Indeed.





Find the right candidates faster
To reach more qualified candidates, pay to promote your postings as Sponsored Jobs.
Sponsored Jobs are the first jobs people see in Indeed search results, and they receive up to 5X more clicks.





Search millions of resumes for free
Find candidates across every industry and location using Indeed Resume, a talent database with more than 70 million resumes.





Elevate your employer brand
With more than 12 million employer reviews, Company Pages give people insights into potential employers and help you create a memorable candidate experience. Build your talent brand for free with your Indeed Company Page.







Get started with Indeed
Post a job in 5 minutes.
Post Job

          ©2017 Indeed – Cookies, Privacy and Terms








































Indeed Resume Search




Find JobsFind ResumesEmployers

Post a Job Sign inwhatwhere××Find ResumesLimit search to: Job TitlesSkillsCompaniesField of StudyAdvanced SearchTo help ensure jobseeker privacy, some information has been hidden.To see full resume details, log in to your Indeed account or create an account for free.Sign in   Create an accountFast, simple resume search.Post a Job-Reach 200 million job seekersIndeed also offered in: españolFind resumes in: Argentina - Australia - België - Brasil - Canada - Colombia - España - France - India - Ireland - Italia - México - Nederland - New Zealand - Singapore - South Africa - United Arab Emirates - United Kingdom - United StatesFeedback - Popular Searches - About - ContactJob Seekers: Post your resume - it only takes a few seconds©2017 Indeed - Cookies, Privacy and TermsLast Updatedwithin last daywithin last weekwithin last monthshow all resumes











Advanced Accelerator Applications - Wikipedia





















 






Advanced Accelerator Applications

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Advanced Accelerator Applications

Industry
Pharmaceuticals


Founded
2002 (2002)


Headquarters
Saint-Genis-Pouilly, France



Key people

Stefano Buono, CEO - Claudio Costamagna, Chairman


Products
GLUSCAN® DOPAVIEW® FLUOROCHOL NETSPOT® CARDIOGEN-82® NEUROLITE® MIBITEC LEUKOKIT®


Revenue
€109.3 million



Number of employees

>500


Website
adacap.com


Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) (NASDAQ: AAAP) is a pharmaceutical group specialised in the field of Molecular Nuclear Medicine.[1] The group operates in all three segments of Molecular Nuclear Medicine (PET, SPECT and Therapy) to diagnose and treat serious conditions in the fields of oncology (cancer), neurology, cardiology, infectious and inflammatory diseases.[2]
Molecular Nuclear Medicine is a medical specialty using small amounts of radioactive materials, called radiopharmaceuticals, to diagnose and treat disease. In nuclear medicine imaging, the radiopharmaceuticals are detected by special types of cameras (PET and SPECT) that work with computers to provide very precise pictures of the area of the body being imaged. Nuclear medicine can be used to treat certain types of cancer and other diseases.[3]
Molecular Imaging allows physicians to see how the body is functioning and to measure its chemical and biological processes. Nuclear medicine procedures can often identify abnormalities very early in the progress of a disease — long before many medical problems are apparent with other diagnostic tests.[4]



Contents


1 History
2 Products
3 Pipeline

3.1 Lutathera
3.2 Other


4 Millburn site
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
AAA was created in 2002 by Italian physicist Stefano Buono to exploit a patent from the European Organization for Nuclear Research (CERN).[5] Today AAA trades on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the ticker “AAAP.” The first day of trading was 11 November 2015.[6]
The group currently has 21 production and research & development facilities that manufacture both diagnostic and therapeutic Molecular Nuclear Medicine products, and over 530 employees in 13 countries (Belgium, France, Germany, Italy, Poland, Portugal, Spain, Switzerland, The Netherlands, UK, Israel, U.S. and Canada).
AAA’s founder and CEO is Stefano Buono. AAA's Board of Directors includes Steven Gannon, Christian Merle, Christine Mikail, Leopoldo Zambeletti, Stefano Buono, Kapil Dhingra,[7] François Nader and Claudio Costamagna.[8] Claudio Costamagna has served as Chairman since June 2012.[9]
AAA announced its full-year results for 2016, with sales of €109,3 million (+23% vs. 2015).
Products[edit]
AAA has a portfolio of diagnostic and therapeutic applications and products in the fields of Molecular Imaging and Therapy. [10] The group’s portfolio of radiopharmaceuticals includes radioactive agents for positron emission tomography (PET) imaging as well as single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) diagnostic products.[11]
Pipeline[edit]
AAA has a broad pipeline of products in development, including several theragnostic pairings for oncology indications.
Lutathera[edit]
The company's lead product in development (in regulatory review), Lutathera, a lutetium-177 (Lu-177) labeled somatostatin analogue peptide, is a theragnostic cancer product being developed to treat certain gastro-entero pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs). It selectively targets over-expressed somatostatin receptors while also giving off gamma emissions to allow physicians to visualize where in the body both the drug and the tumor are. Lutathera is currently administered on a compassionate use and named patient basis for the treatment of NETs in ten European countries and the U.S.[12]
Other[edit]
Somakit-Tate (now marketed as NETSPOT®) and SomaKit TOC™ are novel kits for radiolabeling somatostatin analogue peptides to help diagnose somatostatin receptor-positive NET lesions. Each kit has received orphan drug designation from both the EMA and the FDA.[13][14] In June 2016, the FDA approved NETSPOT® (Somakit-Tate) and in December 2016, the European Commission approved Somakit-TOC™.
Millburn site[edit]
In 2016, AAA opened a light manufacturing and distribution site in Millburn, NJ, a residential town in North Jersey.[15] When the site was first purchased, it caused substantial concerns among local residents.[16] Per the requests of Millburn Residents, the Township Committee hired a nuclear/radiology expert to re-assess the appropriateness of opening a radioactive manufacturing site in the residential area.[17] The expert concluded that the proposed operations at AAA are safe and pose no hazard to the citizens of Millburn.[18][19]
References[edit]


^ PrivateEquityWire, "Advanced Accelerator Applications completes fundraising", Feb 18th, 2014
^ Il Sole 24 Ore, “Dal Cern and Biopark canavese”, March 12th, 2014
^ SNMMI, "About Nuclear Medicine & Molecular Imaging"
^ SNMMI, "Glossary of Molecular Imaging Terms"
^ AdnKronos,“ Research: from Rubbia to AAA, great success for an Italian physicist with European company”. March 19th, 2010.
^ Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November."
^ Kathy Mahdoubi. Molecular Imaging, "Advanced Accelerator Applications keen on board consult from Kapil Dhingra". May 7, 2014.
^ Market Watch, "Kapil Dhingra, Former Head of Roche Oncology, Joins AAA Board of Directors", April 29th, 2014
^ MF Dow Jones, “Claudio Costamagna new Chairman of AAA”, June 21st, 2012
^ Advanced Accelerator Applications Nuclear Medicine Glossary
^ Medicaldevicedaily.com, “AAA to increase clinical trials of MNM diagnostic products”, Febr 19th, 2014
^ "Expanded Access Protocol for Therapeutic Use of 177Lu-DOTA0-Tyr3-Octreotate in Patients With Inoperable, Somatostatin Receptor Positive, Midgut Carcinoid Tumors, Progressive Under Somatostatin Analogue Therapy".
^ Devicespace.com, “Advanced Accelerator Applications Receives Orphan Drug Designation From FDA And European Medicines Agency For Gallium-68 DOTATATE For Use In Patients With Gastro-Entero-Pancreatic Neuroendocrine Tumors”. 3 March 2014.
^ News Medical, "AAA gets orphan drug designation status for radiopharmaceutical, Gallium-68 DOTATATE". 4 March 2014.
^ Danielle Desisto. "Millburn manufacturing site safely produces cancer-fighting drug".
^ "Concerns raised about proposed cancer drug factory in Millburn"
^ Cecilia Levine. "Nuclear meds expert hired". The Record. 7 May 2015.
^ Jonathan Sym. "Advanced Accelerator Application Investigation Results: Risks Are “Close To Zero Without Being Zero” Says Expert". Tap Into Millburn/Short Hills. 18 February 2016.
^ Harry Trumbore. "Expert says radiopharmaceutical factory proposed for Millburn is safe" . 11 February 2016


External links[edit]

Official website
Global Radiopharmaceutical Market 2012-2016
Da Costa Branquinho E. et al. 2013. Radiosynthesis and in vivo evaluation of fluorinated huprine derivates as PET radiotracers of acetylcholinesterase. Nuclear Medicine and Biology. March 2013
Priem T. et al. 2012. Synthesis and reactivity of a bis-sultone cross-linker for peptide conjugation and 18F-radiolabelling via unusual "double click" approach.Org Biomol Chem. 10(5):1068-78
Remetti R. et al. 2011. Monte Carlo simulation and radiometric characterization of proton irradiated 18°-H2O for the treatment of the waste streams originated from 18F-FDG synthesis process . Applied Radiation and Isotopes 69 (2011) 1046–1051
Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November.
Seeking Alpha IPO Preview: Advanced Accelerator Applications





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Advanced_Accelerator_Applications&oldid=790785604"					
Categories: Pharmaceutical companies of FranceFrench companies established in 2002Pharmaceutical companies established in 2002Hidden categories: Pages using infobox company with unsupported parametersOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolFrançais 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 01:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.























Advanced Accelerator Applications - Wikipedia





















 






Advanced Accelerator Applications

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Advanced Accelerator Applications

Industry
Pharmaceuticals


Founded
2002 (2002)


Headquarters
Saint-Genis-Pouilly, France



Key people

Stefano Buono, CEO - Claudio Costamagna, Chairman


Products
GLUSCAN® DOPAVIEW® FLUOROCHOL NETSPOT® CARDIOGEN-82® NEUROLITE® MIBITEC LEUKOKIT®


Revenue
€109.3 million



Number of employees

>500


Website
adacap.com


Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) (NASDAQ: AAAP) is a pharmaceutical group specialised in the field of Molecular Nuclear Medicine.[1] The group operates in all three segments of Molecular Nuclear Medicine (PET, SPECT and Therapy) to diagnose and treat serious conditions in the fields of oncology (cancer), neurology, cardiology, infectious and inflammatory diseases.[2]
Molecular Nuclear Medicine is a medical specialty using small amounts of radioactive materials, called radiopharmaceuticals, to diagnose and treat disease. In nuclear medicine imaging, the radiopharmaceuticals are detected by special types of cameras (PET and SPECT) that work with computers to provide very precise pictures of the area of the body being imaged. Nuclear medicine can be used to treat certain types of cancer and other diseases.[3]
Molecular Imaging allows physicians to see how the body is functioning and to measure its chemical and biological processes. Nuclear medicine procedures can often identify abnormalities very early in the progress of a disease — long before many medical problems are apparent with other diagnostic tests.[4]



Contents


1 History
2 Products
3 Pipeline

3.1 Lutathera
3.2 Other


4 Millburn site
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
AAA was created in 2002 by Italian physicist Stefano Buono to exploit a patent from the European Organization for Nuclear Research (CERN).[5] Today AAA trades on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the ticker “AAAP.” The first day of trading was 11 November 2015.[6]
The group currently has 21 production and research & development facilities that manufacture both diagnostic and therapeutic Molecular Nuclear Medicine products, and over 530 employees in 13 countries (Belgium, France, Germany, Italy, Poland, Portugal, Spain, Switzerland, The Netherlands, UK, Israel, U.S. and Canada).
AAA’s founder and CEO is Stefano Buono. AAA's Board of Directors includes Steven Gannon, Christian Merle, Christine Mikail, Leopoldo Zambeletti, Stefano Buono, Kapil Dhingra,[7] François Nader and Claudio Costamagna.[8] Claudio Costamagna has served as Chairman since June 2012.[9]
AAA announced its full-year results for 2016, with sales of €109,3 million (+23% vs. 2015).
Products[edit]
AAA has a portfolio of diagnostic and therapeutic applications and products in the fields of Molecular Imaging and Therapy. [10] The group’s portfolio of radiopharmaceuticals includes radioactive agents for positron emission tomography (PET) imaging as well as single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) diagnostic products.[11]
Pipeline[edit]
AAA has a broad pipeline of products in development, including several theragnostic pairings for oncology indications.
Lutathera[edit]
The company's lead product in development (in regulatory review), Lutathera, a lutetium-177 (Lu-177) labeled somatostatin analogue peptide, is a theragnostic cancer product being developed to treat certain gastro-entero pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs). It selectively targets over-expressed somatostatin receptors while also giving off gamma emissions to allow physicians to visualize where in the body both the drug and the tumor are. Lutathera is currently administered on a compassionate use and named patient basis for the treatment of NETs in ten European countries and the U.S.[12]
Other[edit]
Somakit-Tate (now marketed as NETSPOT®) and SomaKit TOC™ are novel kits for radiolabeling somatostatin analogue peptides to help diagnose somatostatin receptor-positive NET lesions. Each kit has received orphan drug designation from both the EMA and the FDA.[13][14] In June 2016, the FDA approved NETSPOT® (Somakit-Tate) and in December 2016, the European Commission approved Somakit-TOC™.
Millburn site[edit]
In 2016, AAA opened a light manufacturing and distribution site in Millburn, NJ, a residential town in North Jersey.[15] When the site was first purchased, it caused substantial concerns among local residents.[16] Per the requests of Millburn Residents, the Township Committee hired a nuclear/radiology expert to re-assess the appropriateness of opening a radioactive manufacturing site in the residential area.[17] The expert concluded that the proposed operations at AAA are safe and pose no hazard to the citizens of Millburn.[18][19]
References[edit]


^ PrivateEquityWire, "Advanced Accelerator Applications completes fundraising", Feb 18th, 2014
^ Il Sole 24 Ore, “Dal Cern and Biopark canavese”, March 12th, 2014
^ SNMMI, "About Nuclear Medicine & Molecular Imaging"
^ SNMMI, "Glossary of Molecular Imaging Terms"
^ AdnKronos,“ Research: from Rubbia to AAA, great success for an Italian physicist with European company”. March 19th, 2010.
^ Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November."
^ Kathy Mahdoubi. Molecular Imaging, "Advanced Accelerator Applications keen on board consult from Kapil Dhingra". May 7, 2014.
^ Market Watch, "Kapil Dhingra, Former Head of Roche Oncology, Joins AAA Board of Directors", April 29th, 2014
^ MF Dow Jones, “Claudio Costamagna new Chairman of AAA”, June 21st, 2012
^ Advanced Accelerator Applications Nuclear Medicine Glossary
^ Medicaldevicedaily.com, “AAA to increase clinical trials of MNM diagnostic products”, Febr 19th, 2014
^ "Expanded Access Protocol for Therapeutic Use of 177Lu-DOTA0-Tyr3-Octreotate in Patients With Inoperable, Somatostatin Receptor Positive, Midgut Carcinoid Tumors, Progressive Under Somatostatin Analogue Therapy".
^ Devicespace.com, “Advanced Accelerator Applications Receives Orphan Drug Designation From FDA And European Medicines Agency For Gallium-68 DOTATATE For Use In Patients With Gastro-Entero-Pancreatic Neuroendocrine Tumors”. 3 March 2014.
^ News Medical, "AAA gets orphan drug designation status for radiopharmaceutical, Gallium-68 DOTATATE". 4 March 2014.
^ Danielle Desisto. "Millburn manufacturing site safely produces cancer-fighting drug".
^ "Concerns raised about proposed cancer drug factory in Millburn"
^ Cecilia Levine. "Nuclear meds expert hired". The Record. 7 May 2015.
^ Jonathan Sym. "Advanced Accelerator Application Investigation Results: Risks Are “Close To Zero Without Being Zero” Says Expert". Tap Into Millburn/Short Hills. 18 February 2016.
^ Harry Trumbore. "Expert says radiopharmaceutical factory proposed for Millburn is safe" . 11 February 2016


External links[edit]

Official website
Global Radiopharmaceutical Market 2012-2016
Da Costa Branquinho E. et al. 2013. Radiosynthesis and in vivo evaluation of fluorinated huprine derivates as PET radiotracers of acetylcholinesterase. Nuclear Medicine and Biology. March 2013
Priem T. et al. 2012. Synthesis and reactivity of a bis-sultone cross-linker for peptide conjugation and 18F-radiolabelling via unusual "double click" approach.Org Biomol Chem. 10(5):1068-78
Remetti R. et al. 2011. Monte Carlo simulation and radiometric characterization of proton irradiated 18°-H2O for the treatment of the waste streams originated from 18F-FDG synthesis process . Applied Radiation and Isotopes 69 (2011) 1046–1051
Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November.
Seeking Alpha IPO Preview: Advanced Accelerator Applications





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Advanced_Accelerator_Applications&oldid=790785604"					
Categories: Pharmaceutical companies of FranceFrench companies established in 2002Pharmaceutical companies established in 2002Hidden categories: Pages using infobox company with unsupported parametersOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolFrançais 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 01:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 











Advanced Accelerator Applications - Wikipedia





















 






Advanced Accelerator Applications

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Advanced Accelerator Applications

Industry
Pharmaceuticals


Founded
2002 (2002)


Headquarters
Saint-Genis-Pouilly, France



Key people

Stefano Buono, CEO - Claudio Costamagna, Chairman


Products
GLUSCAN® DOPAVIEW® FLUOROCHOL NETSPOT® CARDIOGEN-82® NEUROLITE® MIBITEC LEUKOKIT®


Revenue
€109.3 million



Number of employees

>500


Website
adacap.com


Advanced Accelerator Applications (AAA) (NASDAQ: AAAP) is a pharmaceutical group specialised in the field of Molecular Nuclear Medicine.[1] The group operates in all three segments of Molecular Nuclear Medicine (PET, SPECT and Therapy) to diagnose and treat serious conditions in the fields of oncology (cancer), neurology, cardiology, infectious and inflammatory diseases.[2]
Molecular Nuclear Medicine is a medical specialty using small amounts of radioactive materials, called radiopharmaceuticals, to diagnose and treat disease. In nuclear medicine imaging, the radiopharmaceuticals are detected by special types of cameras (PET and SPECT) that work with computers to provide very precise pictures of the area of the body being imaged. Nuclear medicine can be used to treat certain types of cancer and other diseases.[3]
Molecular Imaging allows physicians to see how the body is functioning and to measure its chemical and biological processes. Nuclear medicine procedures can often identify abnormalities very early in the progress of a disease — long before many medical problems are apparent with other diagnostic tests.[4]



Contents


1 History
2 Products
3 Pipeline

3.1 Lutathera
3.2 Other


4 Millburn site
5 References
6 External links



History[edit]
AAA was created in 2002 by Italian physicist Stefano Buono to exploit a patent from the European Organization for Nuclear Research (CERN).[5] Today AAA trades on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the ticker “AAAP.” The first day of trading was 11 November 2015.[6]
The group currently has 21 production and research & development facilities that manufacture both diagnostic and therapeutic Molecular Nuclear Medicine products, and over 530 employees in 13 countries (Belgium, France, Germany, Italy, Poland, Portugal, Spain, Switzerland, The Netherlands, UK, Israel, U.S. and Canada).
AAA’s founder and CEO is Stefano Buono. AAA's Board of Directors includes Steven Gannon, Christian Merle, Christine Mikail, Leopoldo Zambeletti, Stefano Buono, Kapil Dhingra,[7] François Nader and Claudio Costamagna.[8] Claudio Costamagna has served as Chairman since June 2012.[9]
AAA announced its full-year results for 2016, with sales of €109,3 million (+23% vs. 2015).
Products[edit]
AAA has a portfolio of diagnostic and therapeutic applications and products in the fields of Molecular Imaging and Therapy. [10] The group’s portfolio of radiopharmaceuticals includes radioactive agents for positron emission tomography (PET) imaging as well as single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) diagnostic products.[11]
Pipeline[edit]
AAA has a broad pipeline of products in development, including several theragnostic pairings for oncology indications.
Lutathera[edit]
The company's lead product in development (in regulatory review), Lutathera, a lutetium-177 (Lu-177) labeled somatostatin analogue peptide, is a theragnostic cancer product being developed to treat certain gastro-entero pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (GEP-NETs). It selectively targets over-expressed somatostatin receptors while also giving off gamma emissions to allow physicians to visualize where in the body both the drug and the tumor are. Lutathera is currently administered on a compassionate use and named patient basis for the treatment of NETs in ten European countries and the U.S.[12]
Other[edit]
Somakit-Tate (now marketed as NETSPOT®) and SomaKit TOC™ are novel kits for radiolabeling somatostatin analogue peptides to help diagnose somatostatin receptor-positive NET lesions. Each kit has received orphan drug designation from both the EMA and the FDA.[13][14] In June 2016, the FDA approved NETSPOT® (Somakit-Tate) and in December 2016, the European Commission approved Somakit-TOC™.
Millburn site[edit]
In 2016, AAA opened a light manufacturing and distribution site in Millburn, NJ, a residential town in North Jersey.[15] When the site was first purchased, it caused substantial concerns among local residents.[16] Per the requests of Millburn Residents, the Township Committee hired a nuclear/radiology expert to re-assess the appropriateness of opening a radioactive manufacturing site in the residential area.[17] The expert concluded that the proposed operations at AAA are safe and pose no hazard to the citizens of Millburn.[18][19]
References[edit]


^ PrivateEquityWire, "Advanced Accelerator Applications completes fundraising", Feb 18th, 2014
^ Il Sole 24 Ore, “Dal Cern and Biopark canavese”, March 12th, 2014
^ SNMMI, "About Nuclear Medicine & Molecular Imaging"
^ SNMMI, "Glossary of Molecular Imaging Terms"
^ AdnKronos,“ Research: from Rubbia to AAA, great success for an Italian physicist with European company”. March 19th, 2010.
^ Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November."
^ Kathy Mahdoubi. Molecular Imaging, "Advanced Accelerator Applications keen on board consult from Kapil Dhingra". May 7, 2014.
^ Market Watch, "Kapil Dhingra, Former Head of Roche Oncology, Joins AAA Board of Directors", April 29th, 2014
^ MF Dow Jones, “Claudio Costamagna new Chairman of AAA”, June 21st, 2012
^ Advanced Accelerator Applications Nuclear Medicine Glossary
^ Medicaldevicedaily.com, “AAA to increase clinical trials of MNM diagnostic products”, Febr 19th, 2014
^ "Expanded Access Protocol for Therapeutic Use of 177Lu-DOTA0-Tyr3-Octreotate in Patients With Inoperable, Somatostatin Receptor Positive, Midgut Carcinoid Tumors, Progressive Under Somatostatin Analogue Therapy".
^ Devicespace.com, “Advanced Accelerator Applications Receives Orphan Drug Designation From FDA And European Medicines Agency For Gallium-68 DOTATATE For Use In Patients With Gastro-Entero-Pancreatic Neuroendocrine Tumors”. 3 March 2014.
^ News Medical, "AAA gets orphan drug designation status for radiopharmaceutical, Gallium-68 DOTATATE". 4 March 2014.
^ Danielle Desisto. "Millburn manufacturing site safely produces cancer-fighting drug".
^ "Concerns raised about proposed cancer drug factory in Millburn"
^ Cecilia Levine. "Nuclear meds expert hired". The Record. 7 May 2015.
^ Jonathan Sym. "Advanced Accelerator Application Investigation Results: Risks Are “Close To Zero Without Being Zero” Says Expert". Tap Into Millburn/Short Hills. 18 February 2016.
^ Harry Trumbore. "Expert says radiopharmaceutical factory proposed for Millburn is safe" . 11 February 2016


External links[edit]

Official website
Global Radiopharmaceutical Market 2012-2016
Da Costa Branquinho E. et al. 2013. Radiosynthesis and in vivo evaluation of fluorinated huprine derivates as PET radiotracers of acetylcholinesterase. Nuclear Medicine and Biology. March 2013
Priem T. et al. 2012. Synthesis and reactivity of a bis-sultone cross-linker for peptide conjugation and 18F-radiolabelling via unusual "double click" approach.Org Biomol Chem. 10(5):1068-78
Remetti R. et al. 2011. Monte Carlo simulation and radiometric characterization of proton irradiated 18°-H2O for the treatment of the waste streams originated from 18F-FDG synthesis process . Applied Radiation and Isotopes 69 (2011) 1046–1051
Insider Monkey Stocks Hot on the Market on Wednesday 11 November.
Seeking Alpha IPO Preview: Advanced Accelerator Applications





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Advanced_Accelerator_Applications&oldid=790785604"					
Categories: Pharmaceutical companies of FranceFrench companies established in 2002Pharmaceutical companies established in 2002Hidden categories: Pages using infobox company with unsupported parametersOfficial website different in Wikidata and Wikipedia 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolFrançais 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 01:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






